Biology:
Biology is defined as the study of living organisms, their origins, anatomy, morphology, physiology, behaviour, and distribution.
Biology is the captivating study of life in all its wondrous forms. It delves into the intricate dance of living organisms, exploring their structures, functions, interactions, and evolution. From the single-celled marvels of the microscopic world to the towering giants of the rainforest, biology encompasses everything that breathes, grows, and adapts.
Etymology:
The word "biology" comes from the Greek words: bios: meaning "life", logos: meaning "study".
Therefore, biology literally translates to "the study of life." This simple yet apt term captures the essence of this vast and dynamic field.
Some fields of biology-
Microbiology: Unveiling the world of microbes, the tiny but mighty engines that drive many ecological processes.
Botany: Exploring the verdant kingdom of plants, their intricate structures, fascinating adaptations, and crucial role in the environment.
Zoology: Delving into the diverse animal kingdom, studying their behaviors, evolution, and intricate life cycles.
Cellular Biology: Unraveling the secrets of the cell, the fundamental unit of life, understanding its structure, functions, and role in living systems.
Genetics: Cracking the code of life, exploring how genes govern traits, evolution, and inheritance.
Ecology: Examining the intricate web of relationships between organisms and their environment, studying how they interact and shape ecosystems.
Molecular Biology: Investigating the building blocks of life, from molecules to protein structures, revealing the inner workings of life at the smallest scale.
Biochemistry: Biochemistry or biological chemistry, is the study of chemical processes in living organisms. It's a sub-discipline of both chemistry and biology.Biochemistry studies the chemical species in all living organisms, from microscopic organisms to the most complex. 

Biological observations from the 18th century: 
- Carl Linnaeus: The Swedish naturalist Carl von Linné (1707-1778) laid the foundation for the modern system of binomial nomenclature. In 1735, he published a basic taxonomy for the natural world, and in the 1750s he introduced scientific names for all his species.
- Brownian motion: Biological observations in the 18th century, such as Brownian motion and the work of Julius Mayor, led to major discoveries in the fields of thermodynamics and energy conservation.
- Theory of evolution: Charles Darwin's theory of evolution was a major discovery in the 18th century.
- Germ theory of disease: Robert Koch's germ theory of disease was a major discovery in the 18th century. The first vaccines were developed by Pasteur later Robert Koch introduced the Germ theory of Disease at the end of the nineteenth century and by the early twentieth century, chemotherapy was developed.
- Antisepsis and anesthesia: Advances in antisepsis and anesthesia at the end of the 18th century placed surgery on a new footing.
- Parasitology and disease transmission: Important work was carried out in other fields of study, such as parasitology and disease transmission.
- The use of Antibiotics began with penicillin by Alexander Fleming in 1928 and steroids were discovered in 1935. Gregor Mendel on inheritance, for which he was considered the father of genetics. The advancement of technology furthered biological research significantly into the 20th century, particularly with respect to understanding microbiology and genetics.
- In 1952, Rosalind Franklin discovered the molecular structure of the DNA double helix, though her male contemporaries Watson and Crick were credited with her discovery.
In the 18th century, great efforts were dedicated to the collection, preservation, and cataloging of flora and fauna.

These examples highlight the fundamental importance of observation in any scientific inquiry:
1. Scientific inquiry indicates to the various ways in which scientists study the natural world and suggested explanations based on the evidence derived from their experimental work. The steps involved in a scientific inquiry are as follows:
Observation,Question,Hypothesis,Experiment,Results,Conclusion.
2. The initial fundamental importance to define and describe Brownian motion was that it supports the modern atomic theory. In the recent days, the mathematical models that describe Brownian motion are used in physics, economics, engineering, math, chemistry, biology, and a host of other disciplines.
3. Mayer was also the first person to propose the vital chemical process which is now referred to as oxidation which is the primary source of energy for all living creature. This relation implies that heat and work are identical to each other and are present in various forms of energy which can be transformed. This law was known as the first law of the caloric theory and led to the formulation of the general principle of conservation of energy.

Exciting aspects of biology include: 
Emerging sciences.
The complexity of living things.
How living things interact with each other and the environment.
The origin of life.
The diversity of life.
The proliferation of fields.
Contributions to medicine.
Contributions to the human condition.

Origin of Thermodynamics with reference to original observations of Robert Brown and Julius Mayor:
A brief account of microscopical observations made in the August, 1827, by Robert brown on the particles contained in the pollen of plants; and on the general existence of active molecules in organic and inorganic bodies when Brown " suspended in water some of the pollen grains of the species Clarkia polycell and examined them closely.
2.He found them “filled with particles” of around 5 µm diameter that were “very evidently in motion”. He was soon satisfied that the movement that was observed in pollen grains “arose not from currents in the fluid or from its gradual evaporation, but belonged to the particle itself”.
3.Brown’s work was the first comprehensive observation of a phenomena called Brownian Motion which remained unexplained until the beginning of the 20th century by Bachelier and most notably by Einstein in his famous paper in 1905. Brownian motion is the most basic description of the dynamics of a particle, price, etc. under the influence of external noise. 
4.Julius Robert von Mayer was a German physician and physicist. The Law of conservation of Energy was first stated by him which states that: energy is neither created nor destroyed. According to Mayer the plants and animals only source of energy was the sun and when absorbed plants convert this light energy to chemical energy through the process of photosynthesis.
5."The plants take in one form of power, light; and produce another power: chemical difference." He used the term ‘power’ for energy and ‘chemical difference’ for chemical energy. He therefore made it clear that plants do not only produce organic matter but also provide the energy which sustains life.
6.Thus, the Brownian motion is one of the characteristic examples used to illustrate the present approaches to stochastic thermodynamics, considerable effort has been made to identify thermodynamic quantities like heat, work, entropy at the level of a single Brownian particle.
7.On the other hand, Julius Mayer is best known for his original statements on the conservation of energy which is now known as the First law of thermodynamics, namely that energy can neither be created nor destroyed. Therefore, the discoveries of Robert Brown and Julius Mayer formed the basis for thermodynamics.

Birds flying:
Birds fly by creating lift and thrust to overcome gravity, drag, and turbulence. Lift is an upward force generated by the way air moves over a bird's wings. 
Birds have several adaptations that allow them to fly, including: 
-Body contour: Spindle-shaped bodies offer less air resistance.
-Feathers: Light feathers and two types of feathers: flight feathers and down feathers.
-Wings: Specially designed air foils.
-Bones: Hollow bones that are very light and strong.
-Lungs: Efficient at getting oxygen.
-Strong Muscles: Large chest muscles that make up as much as 35 percent of a bird's body weight.
Birds fly by flapping their wings, steering mainly with their tails. The basal part of the wing supplies most of the supporting surface, the wing tip most of the propelling force.

Birds and aircraft have some similarities and differences: 
Similarities:
Both are lightweight
Both have similar shapes and structures
Differences:
Birds have feathers, while aircraft do not
Birds' wings provide lift and thrust, while aircraft wings only provide lift
Birds can change their wingspan's shape, while aircraft cannot
Birds use their muscles to generate thrust, while aircraft use engines
Birds can flap their wings up to three times per second, while the fastest aircraft flaps its wings at 0.3 times per second
Birds can fly for long periods of time, while aircraft need to refuel regularly

Fundamental differences between Science and Engineering by drawing a comparison between Eye and Camera:
Then just the conceptual philosophy the human eye and the camera and the human eye have many things in common -- the eye captures images in a similar way the camera captures an image.
Most surprisingly the anatomy of the camera has more similarities to a biological eyeball of a living being than anyone would possibly imagine, including the lens which is compared to cornea and the film-to the retina. These similarities the are viewed in camera gives the appearance of a robotic eye. However, the camera and the eye are no way identical to each other though there are many similarities between them.
1.Cornea and Lens: The cornea is the similar to the “cap” of the eye. This transparent (like clear jelly) structure has a spherical curvature and sits to the front of the eye. However, the lens of a camera is also transparent (glass) and also sits at the front of the body. Like the cornea, the lens also maintains a spherical curvature. The curvature present helps to focus on images towards the right and left partially though not fully. The corneal and lens curvature allows the eye and camera to view, though not in focus, a limited area to both the right and the left. That is, without the curve, the view of the eye and camera would be only focus on the direct image in front of it.
2.Iris and Aperture: The aperture is to the camera as the iris is to the eye, and this reveals one of many similarities between cameras and the eyes. The aperture size refers to how much light is let into the camera and will ultimately hit the sensor or film. As with the case of human eye, when the iris contracts itself, subsequently the pupil becomes smaller and therefore the eye takes in less light. On the other hand, when the iris becomes wide in dark situations, the pupil turns larger, as it can capture more light. The same effect is seen in the case with the aperture; larger (lower) aperture values allow lighter than a small (higher) aperture value. The lens opening is the pupil; the smaller the opening, the less light is allowed inside.
3.Focus in Eyes and Cameras: Both the eye and camera have the tendency to focus on one single object and blur the rest of the object, whether in the foreground (shallow depth of field) or away at a distance. Likewise, the eye can focus on a larger image, just as a camera (greater depth of field)  
4.Scope and Field of View: The camera has a limited scope to capture images around as seen similar to the eye, the curvature of the eye and the lens of the camera allow both to take in what is not directly in front of it. However, the eye can capture in a fixed scope, while a camera's scope can be changed using the focal length of different types of lenses.
5.Retina and Film: The retina is present at the back of the eye its main function is to collect the light reflected from the surrounding environment to form the image. In case of the camera a similar task is performed either by film or sensors in digital cameras. This process underpins both how cameras work and how eyes work.
6.Eye is an organ of sight present in the human body, while a camera is equipment made by humans is used to record images. The most striking difference between an eye and a camera is that an eye cannot record an image. The eyes possess living cells, these living cells are used to detect light and interpret the light and convert this light into electrical signals that are sent to the brain and processed in the brain to from the image.
7.The camera possess has a diaphragm which record the image on to a film or sensor or on tape digitally as in modern cameras. A camera capture in 2 dimensions while the eye captures in 3 dimensions. This means that when we see with our eyes, we see the height, width and depth of the image. With a camera we only see height and width of the image.
8.The Eye has a Stereoscopic vision, and such images can be seen with both eyes open than with a single eye There is no way to have the depth in the picture as a photograph is a flat medium. However, this aspect is almost impossible with a camera.
9.The Retina and Pupil help change accordingly while changing the focus.  In case of the camera the lens is used to change the focus. Eye has a blind spot which is also known as scotoma; however, the cameras do not have any such limitations. The camera is not equipped to capture images in the dark but the eye gets adapted to the dark if necessary and can capture images.
10.The eye can also adapt itself to the dark and within a few seconds one can get start seeing better in the dark. However, if a camera is not equipped to capture images in the dark it can never get accustomed.
11.The eye is highly sensitive to the dust and foreign particles that settle on the outer film. In a camera there is no such issues as any dust can simply be wiped off the lens.

Brownian motion with examples:
Brownian motion is named after the Scottish Botanist Robert Brown, who first observed that pollen grains move in random directions when placed in water.
Brownian motion is the random, movement of particles that cannot be controlled in a fluid as they constantly collide with other molecules (Mitchell and Kagura, 2006). Brownian motion is thus a part responsible of the ability of movement in bacteria that do not encode or express motility movements, such as Streptococcus and Klebsiella species. Brownian motion can also affect “deliberate” movement exhibited by naturally motile bacteria that harbour pili or flagella. For example, an Escherichia coli cell that is swimming toward an area of higher oxygen concentration may fall “off-track” if it physically encounters a particle moving by Brownian motion or if such a particle(s) obstructs the bacterial cell’s path of motion. This form of “interference” adds to the stochasticity with which bacterial direction can change.
Brownian motion takes its name from the Scottish botanist Robert Brown, who observed pollen grains moving randomly in water. He described the motion in 1827 but was unable to explain it. While pedesis takes its name from Brown, he was not the first person to describe it. The Roman poet Lucretius describes the motion of dust particles around the year 60 B.C., which he used as evidence of atoms.
Examples include:
-The motion of pollen grains on still water
-Movement of dust motes in a room (although largely affected by air currents)
-Diffusion of pollutants in the air
-Diffusion of calcium through bones
-Movement of "holes" of electrical charge in semiconductors

Causes of Brownian Motion:
Brownian motion describes randomness and chaos. It is one of the simplest models of randomness.
The size of the particles is inversely proportional to the speed of the motion, i.e. Small particles exhibit faster movements.
This is because the transfer of momentum is inversely proportional to the mass of the particles. Lighter particles obtain greater speeds from collisions.
The speed of the Brownian motion is inversely proportional to the viscosity of the fluid. The lower the viscosity of the fluid, the faster the Brownian movement.
Viscosity is a quantity that expresses the magnitude of the internal friction in a liquid. It is the measure of the fluid’s resistance to flow.

Effects of Brownian Motion:
Brownian movement causes the particles in a fluid to be in constant motion.
This prevents particles from settling down, leading to the stability of colloidal solutions.
A true solution can be distinguished from a colloid with the help of this motion.

Cells:
“A cell is defined as the smallest, basic unit of life that is responsible for all of life’s processes.” Cells are the structural, functional, and biological units of all living beings. A cell can replicate itself independently. Hence, they are known as the building blocks of life. 
Each cell contains a fluid called the cytoplasm, which is enclosed by a membrane. Also present in the cytoplasm are several biomolecules like proteins, nucleic acids and lipids. Moreover, cellular structures called cell organelles are suspended in the cytoplasm.
Robert Hooke was the first Biologist who discovered cells. All organisms are made up of cells. They may be made up of a single cell (unicellular), or many cells (multicellular).  Mycoplasmas are the smallest known cells. Cells are the building blocks of all living beings. They provide structure to the body and convert the nutrients taken from the food into energy.
Characteristics of Cells -
Following are the various essential characteristics of cells:
Cells provide structure and support to the body of an organism.
The cell interior is organised into different individual organelles surrounded by a separate membrane.
The nucleus (major organelle) holds genetic information necessary for reproduction and cell growth.
Every cell has one nucleus and membrane-bound organelles in the cytoplasm.
Mitochondria, a double membrane-bound organelle is mainly responsible for the energy transactions vital for the survival of the cell.
Lysosomes digest unwanted materials in the cell.
Endoplasmic reticulum plays a significant role in the internal organisation of the cell by synthesising selective molecules and processing, directing and sorting them to their appropriate locations.

Types of Cells:
Cells are similar to factories with different labourers and departments that work towards a common objective. Various types of cells perform different functions. Based on cellular structure, there are two types of cells:
1.Prokaryotic Cells:
Prokaryotic cells have no nucleus. Instead, some prokaryotes such as bacteria have a region within the cell where the genetic material is freely suspended. This region is called the nucleoid.
They all are single-celled microorganisms. Examples include archaea, bacteria, and cyanobacteria. The cell size ranges from 0.1 to 0.5 µm in diameter. The hereditary material can either be DNA or RNA.
Prokaryotes generally reproduce by binary fission, a form of asexual reproduction. They are also known to use conjugation – which is often seen as the prokaryotic equivalent to sexual reproduction (however, it is NOT sexual reproduction).
2.Eukaryotic Cells:
Eukaryotic cells are characterised by a true nucleus. The size of the cells ranges between 10–100 µm in diameter. This broad category involves plants, fungi, protozoans, and animals.
The plasma membrane is responsible for monitoring the transport of nutrients and electrolytes in and out of the cells. It is also responsible for cell to cell communication.
They reproduce sexually as well as asexually. There are some contrasting features between plant and animal cells. For eg., the plant cell contains chloroplast, central vacuoles, and other plastids, whereas the animal cells do not.

Prokaryotes vs. Eukaryotes:
1. Type of Cell:
Prokaryotes: Always unicellular.
Eukaryotes: Unicellular and multicellular.
2. Cell Size:
Prokaryotes: Ranges from 0.2 μm – 2.0 μm in diameter.
Eukaryotes: Size ranges from 10 μm – 100 μm in diameter.
3. Cell Wall:
Prokaryotes: Usually present; chemically complex in nature.
Eukaryotes: When present, chemically simple in nature.
4. Nucleus:
Prokaryotes: Absent. Instead, they have a nucleoid region in the cell.
Eukaryotes: Present.
5. Ribosomes:
Prokaryotes: Present. Smaller in size and spherical in shape.
Eukaryotes: Present. Comparatively larger in size and linear in shape.
6. DNA Arrangement:
Prokaryotes: Circular.
Eukaryotes: Linear.
7. Mitochondria:
Prokaryotes: Absent.
Eukaryotes: Present.
8. Cytoplasm:
Prokaryotes: Present, but cell organelles absent.
Eukaryotes: Present, with cell organelles.
9. Endoplasmic Reticulum:
Prokaryotes: Absent.
Eukaryotes: Present.
10. Plasmids:
Prokaryotes: Present.
Eukaryotes: Very rarely found.
11. Ribosome Type:
Prokaryotes: Small ribosomes.
Eukaryotes: Large ribosomes.
12. Lysosome:
Prokaryotes: Lysosomes and centrosomes are absent.
Eukaryotes: Lysosomes and centrosomes are present.
13. Cell Division:
Prokaryotes: Through binary fission.
Eukaryotes: Through mitosis.
14. Flagella:
Prokaryotes: The flagella are smaller in size.
Eukaryotes: The flagella are larger in size.
15. Reproduction:
Prokaryotes: Asexual.
Eukaryotes: Both asexual and sexual.
16. Example:
Prokaryotes: Bacteria and Archaea.
Eukaryotes: Plant and Animal cells.

Functions of Cell:
A cell performs major functions essential for the growth and development of an organism. Important functions of cell are as follows:
Provides Support and Structure: All the organisms are made up of cells. They form the structural basis of all the organisms. The cell wall and the cell membrane are the main components that function to provide support and structure to the organism. For eg., the skin is made up of a large number of cells. Xylem present in the vascular plants is made of cells that provide structural support to the plants.
Facilitate Growth Mitosis: In the process of mitosis, the parent cell divides into the daughter cells. Thus, the cells multiply and facilitate the growth in an organism.
Allows Transport of Substances: Various nutrients are imported by the cells to carry out various chemical processes going on inside the cells. The waste produced by the chemical processes is eliminated from the cells by active and passive transport. Small molecules such as oxygen, carbon dioxide, and ethanol diffuse across the cell membrane along the concentration gradient. This is known as passive transport. The larger molecules diffuse across the cell membrane through active transport where the cells require a lot of energy to transport the substances.
Energy Production: Cells require energy to carry out various chemical processes. This energy is produced by the cells through a process called photosynthesis in plants and respiration in animals.
Aids in Reproduction: A cell aids in reproduction through the processes called mitosis and meiosis. Mitosis is termed as the asexual reproduction where the parent cell divides to form daughter cells. Meiosis causes the daughter cells to be genetically different from the parent cells.

Cell Structure:
The cell structure comprises individual components with specific functions essential to carry out life’s processes. These components include- cell wall, cell membrane, cytoplasm, nucleus, and cell organelles. Read on to explore more insights on cell structure and function.
Cell Membrane:
-The cell membrane supports and protects the cell. It controls the movement of substances in and out of the cells. It separates the cell from the external environment. The cell membrane is present in all the cells.
-The cell membrane is the outer covering of a cell within which all other organelles, such as the cytoplasm and nucleus, are enclosed. It is also referred to as the plasma membrane.
-By structure, it is a porous membrane (with pores) which permits the movement of selective substances in and out of the cell.  Besides this, the cell membrane also protects the cellular component from damage and leakage.
-It forms the wall-like structure between two cells as well as between the cell and its surroundings.
-Plants are immobile, so their cell structures are well-adapted to protect them from external factors. The cell wall helps to reinforce this function.
Cell Wall:
-The cell wall is the most prominent part of the plant’s cell structure. It is made up of cellulose, hemicellulose and pectin.
-The cell wall is present exclusively in plant cells. It protects the plasma membrane and other cellular components. The cell wall is also the outermost layer of plant cells.
-It is a rigid and stiff structure surrounding the cell membrane.
-It provides shape and support to the cells and protects them from mechanical shocks and injuries.
Cytoplasm:
-The cytoplasm is a thick, clear, jelly-like substance present inside the cell membrane.
-Most of the chemical reactions within a cell take place in this cytoplasm.
-The cell organelles such as endoplasmic reticulum, vacuoles, mitochondria, ribosomes, are suspended in this cytoplasm.
Nucleus:
-The nucleus contains the hereditary material of the cell, the DNA.
-It sends signals to the cells to grow, mature, divide and die.
-The nucleus is surrounded by the nuclear envelope that separates the DNA from the rest of the cell.
-The nucleus protects the DNA  and is an integral component of a plant’s cell structure.

Cell Organelles:
Cells are composed of various cell organelles that perform certain specific functions to carry out life’s processes. The different cell organelles, along with its principal functions, are as follows:
Cell Organelles and their Functions-
Nucleolus:The nucleolus is the site of ribosome synthesis. Also, it is involved in controlling cellular activities and cellular reproduction.
Nuclear membrane:The nuclear membrane protects the nucleus by forming a boundary between the nucleus and other cell organelles.
Chromosomes:Chromosomes play a crucial role in determining the sex of an individual. Each human cells contain 23 pairs of chromosomes.
Endoplasmic reticulum:The endoplasmic reticulum is involved in the transportation of substances throughout the cell. It plays a primary role in the metabolism of carbohydrates, synthesis of lipids, steroids and proteins.
Golgi Bodies:Golgi bodies are called the cell’s post office as it is involved in the transportation of materials within the cell.
Ribosome:Ribosomes are the protein synthesisers of the cell.
Mitochondria:The mitochondrion is called “the powerhouse of the cell.” It is called so because it produces ATP – the cell’s energy currency.
Lysosomes:Lysosomes protect the cell by engulfing the foreign bodies entering the cell and help in cell renewal. Therefore, they are known as the cell’s suicide bags.
Chloroplast: Chloroplasts are the primary organelles for photosynthesis. It contains the pigment called chlorophyll.
Vacuoles: Vacuoles store food, water, and other waste materials in the cell.

Based on the number of cells these organisms possess, they can be classified into: 
1.Unicellular Organisms and 2.Multicellular Organisms.
Unicellular Organisms vs. Multicellular Organisms:
1. Composition:
Unicellular Organisms: Composed of a single cell.
Multicellular Organisms: Composed of more than one cell.
2. Body Organization:
Unicellular Organisms: Simple body organization.
Multicellular Organisms: Complex body organization.
3. Life Processes:
Unicellular Organisms: A single cell carries out all necessary life processes.
Multicellular Organisms: Multiple cells perform different functions.
4. Exposure to Environment:
Unicellular Organisms: The total cell body is exposed to the environment.
Multicellular Organisms: Only the outer cells are exposed to the environment.
5. Division of Labor:
Unicellular Organisms: Division of labor is at the organelle level.
Multicellular Organisms: Division of labor is at cellular, tissue, organs, and organ system levels.
6. Types of Cells:
Unicellular Organisms: Include both eukaryotes and prokaryotes.
Multicellular Organisms: Include only eukaryotes.
7. Lifespan:
Unicellular Organisms: Lifespan is usually short.
Multicellular Organisms: Have a comparatively longer lifespan.
8. Response to Injury:
Unicellular Organisms: Injury to the cell leads to the death of the organism.
Multicellular Organisms: Injury to a cell does not cause the death of the multicellular organism.
9. Reproduction:
Unicellular Organisms: Asexual reproduction is predominant, however, sexual reproduction is also seen (conjugation).
Multicellular Organisms: Reproduction happens sexually as well as asexually.
10. Cell Differentiation:
Unicellular Organisms: Cell differentiation is absent.
Multicellular Organisms: Cell differentiation is present.
11. Nutritional Mode:
Unicellular Organisms: Can be autotrophs or heterotrophs.
Multicellular Organisms: Include both autotrophs and heterotrophs.
12. Size:
Unicellular Organisms: They are microscopic in nature.
Multicellular Organisms: Most are macroscopic in nature.
13. Examples:
Unicellular Organisms: Bacteria, amoeba, paramecium, and yeast.
Multicellular Organisms: Humans, animals, plants, birds, and insects.

Classification of Living Organisms:
Taxonomy refers to the process of classifying creatures. Taxonomic hierarchy refers to the sequence of categories in decreasing or increasing order. Kingdom is the highest rank and species is the lowest rank in the hierarchy or vice versa. ‘Taxis,’ which signifies ‘arrangement,’ and ‘Nomos,’ which signifies ‘method,’ are the two words that make up taxonomy. The scientific discipline of taxonomy classifies organisms based on certain characteristics. Carolus Linnaeus, a Swedish botanist, created the present taxonomy system. To explain the taxonomy, Linnaeus devised the below hierarchy of groups:
- Domain -> Kingdom -> Phylum -> Class -> Order -> Family -> Genus -> Species.
The domain is the highest order and broadest category in this hierarchy, whereas Species is the lowest category in this hierarchy. ‘Domains’ are divided into three broad categories based on the differences between eukaryotes and prokaryotes: Archaea, Eubacteria, and Eukaryote.

Three Kingdom Classification (Molecular taxonomy):
The three-kingdom classification system was proposed by Ernst Haeckel in the 1860s. He divided organisms into three kingdoms based on their characteristics and functions: 
1) Animalia: Animals. 2)Plantae: Plants. 3)Protista: Eukaryotes.
The three-kingdom classification system has some limitations: 
-Each group has a wide variety of organisms with distinct properties.
-Prokaryotes and eukaryotes were not separated.
-Protista includes both unicellular and multicellular organisms.
-Viruses weren't included in any group.
The three-domain system sorts the previously known kingdoms into three domains: Archaea, Bacteria, Eukarya. 
Prokaryotic organisms belong either to the domain Archaea or the domain Bacteria. Organisms with eukaryotic cells belong to the domain Eukarya.

Five Broad Kingdoms of Classification of Living Organisms:
Classification of living organisms can be understood under five broad kingdoms.
The five kingdom classification was proposed by R. H. Whittaker. The main criteria for this classification are: 
Cell structure, Body organization, Mode of nutrition and reproduction, Phylogenetic relationships.
The five kingdom classification of living things is: 
-Animalia Kingdom: Animal classification is the most advanced classification of living organisms, with vertebrates and invertebrates being the two major categories. These creatures are multicellular with aerobic respiration possessing sexual reproduction abilities, and movement capabilities. Mammals, fish species, bird types, reptiles category, amphibians, and insect types are among the many species found in this kingdom.
-Plantae Kingdom: The Plantae kingdom, which includes trees, plants, and other natural vegetation, is one of the earliest classifications of living organisms. It is distinguished by its immovable, multicellular, and nature of being eukaryotic. Because they generate oxygen in the process of photosynthesis, these autotrophic organisms with cellulose and chlorophyll in their cells are vital for life on Earth. In terms of reproduction, they either use sexual or asexual methods.
-Fungi Kingdom: This term of classification of living organisms refers to the kingdom of fungus, which includes yeasts, molds, and all types of mushrooms and related species. Chitin is found in the cell walls of these multicellular eukaryotes are aerobic & heterotrophic. They feed on other living organisms and reproduce via spores.
-Protista Kingdom: All other eukaryotes are descendants of this group and are the most primitive of the eukaryotes. The Protista kingdom includes eukaryotic species that aren’t considered animals, plants, or fungi, such as protozoa, and is paraphyletic, containing the common origin but not all of its offspring. Some members of this kingdom include: Amoeba, Protozoa, Diatoms, Euglena, Algae,Paramecium.
-Monera Kingdom: The prokaryotes are grouped in this category of microscopic living creatures (archaea and bacteria). This group consists of single-celled organisms with no identifiable nucleus that can be found in all settings. Most microorganisms are aerobic and heterotrophic, whereas archaea are anaerobic and have a chemosynthetic metabolism. 

Classification of organisms based on habitat:
Habitat: Habitat is a place where an organism lives and includes all biotic and abiotic factors surrounding the environment.
Classification: The science of classifying and naming organisms is known as taxonomy. Taxonomists are known to classify organisms into a structural hierarchy which is a multilevel system in which each group is contained within a larger group.
Classification on the basis of habitat:
Animals were classified on the basis of habitat by Aristotle, who is known as the “Father of biological classification".
He described animals on the basis of their environment which included water, air, and land.
He recognized the importance of grouping and dividing animals on the basis of group names.
Currently, animals are classified on the basis of habitat as terrestrial animals which live on the land, aquatic animals which live on the water, and aerial animals which can fly.
Aristotle classified organisms into three categories based on their habitat: 
1.Terrestrial Animals:
Definition: Terrestrial animals are those that primarily inhabit land.
Characteristics:
Includes a wide range of animals from insects to mammals.
Adapted to live on and move across the Earth's surface.
Often possess structures like legs or feet for locomotion on land.
Examples: Lions, elephants, insects, reptiles.
2.Aerial Animals:
Definition: Aerial animals are those that primarily live and move through the air.
Characteristics:
Adapted to flight or gliding.
Possess wings or other specialized structures for aerial locomotion.
May spend a significant part of their life in the air.
Examples: Birds, bats, flying insects.
3.Aquatic Animals:
Definition: Aquatic animals are those that primarily live in water.
Characteristics:
Adapted to aquatic environments, whether freshwater or marine.
May have fins, gills, and streamlined bodies for swimming.
Includes a diverse range of organisms from fish to marine mammals.
Examples: Fish, dolphins, sharks, mollusks.
Some examples of amphibious animals include: Frogs, Tortoises, Crocodiles. 

Terrestrial Animals vs. Aerial Animals vs. Aquatic Animals:
1. Habitat:
Terrestrial Animals: Primarily inhabit land environments.
Aerial Animals: Primarily live and move through the air.
Aquatic Animals: Primarily live in water environments.
2. Adaptations for Locomotion:
Terrestrial Animals: Often have legs or feet for walking or running on land.
Aerial Animals: Possess wings or other specialized structures for flight or gliding.
Aquatic Animals: Have fins, tails, and streamlined bodies for swimming in water.
3. Respiratory Structures:
Terrestrial Animals: Typically have lungs for breathing air.
Aerial Animals: Have efficient respiratory systems, often involving air sacs for continuous airflow during flight.
Aquatic Animals: Often have gills for extracting oxygen from water.
4. Skeletal Structure:
Terrestrial Animals: Often have a strong skeletal structure to support the body against gravity.
Aerial Animals: Possess lightweight skeletons, especially in flying species, to facilitate flight.
Aquatic Animals: May have streamlined skeletons for buoyancy and swimming in water.
5. Reproductive Strategies:
Terrestrial Animals: Various reproductive strategies, including internal fertilization and a range of parenting behaviors.
Aerial Animals: Diverse reproductive methods, with some species exhibiting elaborate courtship rituals and nesting behaviors.
Aquatic Animals: Exhibit various reproductive strategies, such as external fertilization in fish and complex mating behaviors in marine mammals.
6. Water Conservation:
Terrestrial Animals: Typically have adaptations for water conservation, such as concentrated urine and efficient kidneys.
Aerial Animals: May have adaptations for water conservation, as water is often limited during flight.
Aquatic Animals: Generally do not face the same water conservation challenges, as they live in a water-rich environment.
7. Thermoregulation:
Terrestrial Animals: Have adaptations for regulating body temperature in response to terrestrial climates.
Aerial Animals: May have physiological adaptations for maintaining body temperature during flight, such as efficient heat exchange mechanisms.
Aquatic Animals: Often maintain body temperature through behavioral adaptations, seeking warmer or cooler waters.
8. Examples:
Terrestrial Animals: Lions, elephants, insects.
Aerial Animals: Birds, bats, flying insects.
Aquatic Animals: Fish, dolphins, sharks, mollusks.

Classification of organisms based on their mode of nutrition:
Organisms can be classified based on their mode of nutrition, which refers to how they obtain and utilize nutrients for energy and growth. The three main types of nutrition classification are autotrophs, heterotrophs, and lithotrophs.
1. Autotrophs:
Definition: Autotrophs are organisms that produce their own organic compounds and nutrients from simple inorganic substances like carbon dioxide and water, using an external energy source such as sunlight or chemicals.
Types:
Photoautotrophs: Use light energy to convert carbon dioxide and water into organic compounds through photosynthesis. Examples include plants, algae, and some bacteria.
Chemoautotrophs: Utilize inorganic chemicals as an energy source to convert carbon dioxide into organic compounds. Examples include certain bacteria and archaea found in extreme environments like hydrothermal vents.
2. Heterotrophs:
Definition: Heterotrophs are organisms that cannot produce their own organic compounds and depend on external sources, such as other organisms, for their nutrition.
Types:
Photoheterotrophs: Use light energy but require organic compounds as a carbon source. Examples include some bacteria and certain aquatic microorganisms.
Chemoheterotrophs: Obtain both energy and carbon from organic compounds. This group includes animals, fungi, and most bacteria.
3. Lithotrophs:
Definition: Lithotrophs are organisms that utilize inorganic substances as their source of energy. They are a subgroup of autotrophs and heterotrophs.
Types:
Lithoautotrophs: Obtain energy from inorganic sources and use it to produce their own organic compounds. Examples include some bacteria that oxidize minerals.
Lithoheterotrophs: Depend on inorganic substances for energy but require organic compounds for carbon. These are less common and are found among certain bacteria.

Classification of organism on the basis of Energy:
Autotrophs: Autotrophs are organisms that can produce their own energy-rich organic compounds using inorganic sources. They utilize sunlight (photosynthesis) or inorganic compounds (chemosynthesis) to convert carbon dioxide into organic molecules. Examples include plants, algae, and some bacteria.
Heterotrophs: Heterotrophs are organisms that obtain energy by consuming other organic matter. They rely on consuming autotrophs or other heterotrophs to obtain the necessary organic molecules for energy. Examples include animals, fungi, and most bacteria.

Classification of organism on the basis of Carbon Utilization:
Photoautotrophs: Photoautotrophs are autotrophs that use sunlight as a source of energy for photosynthesis to convert carbon dioxide into organic molecules. Examples include plants, algae, and some bacteria.
Chemoautotrophs: Chemoautotrophs are autotrophs that use energy obtained from chemical reactions, such as oxidizing inorganic compounds, to produce organic molecules. Examples include certain bacteria and archaea found in extreme environments like hydrothermal vents.
Photoheterotrophs: Photoheterotrophs are organisms that obtain energy from sunlight but rely on organic compounds as a source of carbon. They combine photosynthesis with the uptake of organic molecules from their environment. Examples include some bacteria and protists.
Chemoheterotrophs: Chemoheterotrophs obtain both energy and carbon from consuming organic compounds produced by other organisms. Examples include animals, fungi, most bacteria, and many protists.

Differences Between Autotrophs and Heterotrophs:
1. Type of Organisms:
Autotrophs: Members of the plant kingdom and certain unicellular organisms like cyanobacteria.
Heterotrophs: All members of the animal kingdom.
2. Mode of Nutrition:
Autotrophs: Producers that prepare their own food through processes like photosynthesis or chemosynthesis.
Heterotrophs: Consumers that depend on other organisms for their food.
3. Classified Into:
Autotrophs: Classified as photoautotrophs (use light for synthesis) and chemoautotrophs (utilize inorganic compounds for synthesis).
Heterotrophs: Classified as photoheterotrophs (use light but rely on organic compounds for nutrition) and chemoheterotrophs (obtain both energy and carbon from organic sources).
4. Presence of Chloroplasts:
Autotrophs: Contain chloroplasts, specialized organelles for photosynthesis.
Heterotrophs: Do not contain chloroplasts and cannot perform photosynthesis.
5. Energy Obtained From:
Autotrophs: Obtain energy from inorganic sources by converting light energy into chemical energy (photosynthesis) or using inorganic compounds (chemosynthesis).
Heterotrophs: Obtain energy directly or indirectly from other organisms by consuming organic matter.
6. Energy Storage:
Autotrophs: Can store energy in the form of carbohydrates and other organic molecules produced during photosynthesis.
Heterotrophs: Cannot store energy in the form of light or chemical energy; rely on continuous intake of food.
7. In Food Chain:
Autotrophs: Placed at the primary level in the food chain as they capture and store energy from the environment.
Heterotrophs: Placed in the secondary or tertiary level in the food chain as they consume other organisms for energy.
8. Locomotion:
Autotrophs: Cannot move from their place; typically, they are rooted or attached to a substrate.
Heterotrophs: Can move from one place to another in search of food and shelter, showing greater mobility.
9. Examples:
Autotrophs: Green plants, algae, and some photosynthetic bacteria.
Heterotrophs: Cows, buffaloes, tigers, horses, humans, and all animals

Main Nutritional Differences Between Autotrophs and Heterotrophs:
Autotrophs and heterotrophs are two nutritional modes that represent the flow of energy and nutrition in an ecosystem. 
Autotrophs are organisms that produce their own food. They use inorganic materials like light, water, carbon dioxide, and other chemicals to create food. The process of photosynthesis uses sunlight to combine water and carbon dioxide to make glucose. Autotrophs are also called producers. 
Nutrients: Autotrophs need sunlight, water, carbon dioxide, chlorophyll, and other chemicals.
Examples: Plants are the most familiar type of autotroph.
Heterotrophs are organisms that consume other organisms or organic matter for energy. They use cellular respiration to turn their food into energy. Heterotrophs are also called consumers. 
Nutrients: Heterotrophs need carbon, nitrogen, and phosphorus.
Examples: Animals, fungi, many protists, and bacteria are heterotrophs. Humans and animals are also heterotrophs because they depend on plants for food.

Role of aparture in both camera and the human eye:
The aperture in a camera is similar to the pupil in the human eye. Both open and close to control the amount of light that passes through. The size of the aperture can be changed, just as a pupil shrinks in bright sunlight and expands in the dark.
Aperture in a camera -
Function: Controls the amount of light that passes through the lens
Size: Larger aperture openings allow more light to pass through
Effect: Affects depth of field and shutter speed
Aperture in the human eye -
Function: Regulates the amount of light that travels through the lens into the retina
Size: Shrinks in bright sunlight and expands in the dark
Part of: The iris, a black muscular tissue with a ring-like structure behind the cornea

This is how the camera aperture can be compared with human eyes:
1) The human eye and camera both have convex lens which form real and inverted image.
2) Eye's iris and the camera's aperture both passes the amount of light and both change depending on lighting conditions.
3) Both Eye and the camera focus on single objects and on large images and capture large scapes.

Model Organisms for the study of Biology:
A model organism is a species that has been widely studied, usually because it is easy to maintain and breed in a laboratory setting and has particular experimental advantages.
Model organisms are non-human species that are used in the laboratory to help scientists understand biological processes.
They are usually organisms that are easy to maintain and breed in a laboratory setting.
For example, they may have particularly robust embryos that are easily studied and manipulated in the lab, this is useful for scientists studying development.
Or they may occupy a pivotal position in the evolutionary tree, this is useful for scientists studying evolution.
Examples of model organisms used to study genetics
Yeast (Saccharomyces cerevisiae), Fruit fly (Drosophila melanogaster), Nematode worm (Caenorhabditis elegans), Western clawed frog (Xenopus tropicalis), Mouse (Mus musculus), Zebrafish (Danio rerio).
Examples:
(a) E. coli: E. coli, (Escherichia coli) is a rod-shaped (bacillus) Gram-negative bacterium that is frequently used as a model organism.  Its striking features such as its ability to grow fast using cheap growth media and availability of molecular tools to perform genetic manipulations are favourable for using E. coli as a model organism in molecular genetics and molecular biology.
Several key discoveries in the field of molecular biology, including molecular genetics, were achieved using E. coli as a model organism. This includes an understanding of the genetic code, the mechanisms of DNA replication, the discovery of the genetic operon systems, and the creation of a genetically modified organism.
(b) Saccharomyces cerevisiae (is a species of yeast). The species is extensively used in fermentation industry. Saccharomyces has been instrumental in winemaking, baking, and brewing since ancient times. It is believed to have been originally isolated from the skin of grapes (it can be seen that yeast is present as a component of the thin white film on the skins of some dark-coloured fruits such as plums;
It is present among the waxes of the cuticle). It is one of the most intensively studied Eukaryotic model in molecular and cell biology, it is the microorganism behind the most common type of fermentation. . cerevisiae cells are round to ovoid, 5–10 µm in diameter. It reproduces by budding.
(c) C.elegance: Caenorhabditis elegans is a minute, free-living nematode occurring worldwide. Newly hatched larvae are 0.25 millimetres long and adults are 1 millimetre long. C. elegans has a very rapid life cycle which lasts for 3 days (3 days at 25° from egg to egg-laying adult) and exists primarily as a self-fertilizing hermaphrodite,
These striking features have helped scientists to make C. elegans is used extensively in genetic studies and is a powerful choice as a model organism for eukaryotic genetic studies. In addition, because the animal possesses an invariant quantity of somatic cells, researchers have been able to trace the fate of every cell between events like fertilization and adulthood in live animals and to generate a complete cell lineage.
(d) D.Melanogaster : One species of Drosophila in particular, D.Melanogaster, has been extensively used in research in genetics and is a common model organism in developmental biology. In modern biological literature the terms “Drosophila” and the term "fruit fly" and "Drosophila" are often used together with D. melanogaster. The entire genus, however, consists of more than 1,500 species and shows diverse behaviour in appearance, breeding habitat and behaviour.  The fly is extensively used for carving muscle degeneration disorders because there are no satellite muscles identified that would repair an injury in an adult muscle.
(e) A.Thaliana: Arabidopsis thaliana is a small flowering plant that is widely used as a model organism in plant biology. This species belongs to the Mustard family (Brassicaceae), which includes species like cabbage and radish.
Arabidopsis is not of major significance in agronomic field, but its striking feature of genome size and ease of cultivation offer good advantages for basic research in Genetics and molecular biology. Arabidopsis thaliana has a genome size of approximately 135Mb and has a haploid chromosome.
This species occurs in winter as an annual plant and has relatively short life cycle, A. thaliana is a popular model organism in genetics and plant biology. For a complex multicellular eukaryote, A. thaliana has a relatively small genome of approximately 135 mega base pairs (mbp). It was the first plant to have its genome sequenced, and is a popular tool for understanding the molecular biology of many plant traits, including light sensing and flower development.
(f) M.musculus: The house mouse (Mus musculus) is of the order of Rodentia, it is a small mammal, that has a characteristic ears that are rounded a long and hairy tail a pointed snout. The species are great in number and belong to the genus Mus. Although the mammal is a wild animal, the house mouse has benefited immensely from being associated with human habitation to the point where human activity is more the wild type are comparatively less than the semi tamed ones.
The house mouse is domesticated as the pet or mouse, and as the laboratory mouse, which is one of the most important model organisms in biology and medicine.

First person to introduce the system of classification:
Carl Linnaeus published a system for classifying living things, which has been useful in developing into the modern classification system. Linnaeus was the first scientist to propose a hierarchal naming structure that suggested information both about what the species was (its name) and also its closest comparative species. The ability of the Linnean system to convey the complex relationships to scientists throughout the world is the reason for it to be so widely used, despite this classification existing for hundreds of years, the classification —taxonomy — is far from dead. Classification of many species, that may be old and new, continues to be officially disputed as scientists find new information or interpret facts in new methods or ways

Uricotelic: 
The uricotelic organism excretes uric acid or its salts. In comparison to Ammonia and Urea, Uric acid is the least toxic in nature and the least soluble in water. It can be stored in cells and body tissues without toxic effects and thus needs least water and is highly efficient mode of excretion in comparison to two other methods. Uricotelic organisms include terrestrial arthropods (including insects), snakes, lizards and birds. The excreta of uricotelic organisms look typically like white paste.

Extremophiles:
Many unicellular organisms can live in extreme environments, such as hot springs, thermal ocean vents, polar ice, and frozen tundra. These unicellular organisms are collectively called extremophiles. Extremophiles are resistant to extremes of temperature or pH, and are specially adapted to live in places where multicellular organisms cannot survive. This unique feature allows scientists to use unicellular organisms in many ways previously only imagined. However, not all unicellular organisms are extremophiles. Many other unicellular organisms live under the same narrow range of living conditions as multicellular organisms, but still produce things necessary to all life forms on Earth.

Single gene disorder/Mendelian disorder:
Mendelian disorders, also known as Mendelian genetic disorders or monogenic disorders, are a category of genetic diseases that result from mutations in a single gene. These disorders follow Mendelian inheritance patterns, which are predictable and often follow simple rules of inheritance.

There are three main types of Mendelian disorders:
1.Autosomal Dominant Disorders: In these disorders, a mutation in one copy of the gene (one allele) is sufficient to cause the disease. A child has a 50% chance of inheriting the mutated gene from an affected parent. Examples include Huntington's disease and Marfan syndrome.
2.Autosomal Recessive Disorders: For these disorders, an individual must inherit two copies of the mutated gene (one from each parent) to develop the disease. If both parents are carriers (heterozygous), there is a 25% chance their child will have the disorder. Examples include cystic fibrosis and sickle cell anemia.
3.X-Linked Disorders: These disorders are caused by mutations in genes located on the X chromosome. They primarily affect males because they have only one X chromosome. Females, with two X chromosomes, are usually carriers. Examples include hemophilia and Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
Mendelian disorders can manifest with a wide range of symptoms and severity levels, depending on the specific gene and mutation involved. Advances in genetic testing and understanding of these disorders have led to better diagnosis, management, and, in some cases, potential treatments.
Genetic counseling and testing play crucial roles in helping individuals and families at risk of Mendelian disorders make informed decisions about family planning and healthcare. Additionally, ongoing genetic research continues to uncover new insights into the molecular mechanisms underlying these disorders, offering hope for improved therapies and interventions in the future.

Monomers:
The word monomer comes from mono- (one) and -mer (part). Monomers are small molecules which may be joined together in a repeating fashion to form more complex molecules called polymers. Monomers form polymers by forming chemical bonds or binding supramolecularly through a process called polymerization.
Sometimes polymers are made from bound groups of monomer subunits (up to a few dozen monomers) called oligomers. To qualify as an oligomer, the properties of the molecule need to change significantly if one or a few subunits are added or removed. Examples of oligomers include collagen and liquid paraffin.
A related term is "monomeric protein," which is a protein that bonds to make a multiprotein complex. Monomers are not just building blocks of polymers, but are important molecules in their own right, which do not necessarily form polymers unless the conditions are right.
Examples of Monomers:
Examples of monomers include vinyl chloride (which polymerizes into polyvinyl chloride or PVC), glucose (which polymerizes into starch, cellulose, laminarin, and glucans), and amino acids (which polymerize into peptides, polypeptides, and proteins). 

Polymers:
The word polymer comes from poly- (many) and -mer (part). A polymer may be a natural or synthetic macromolecule comprised of repeating units of a smaller molecule (monomers). While many people use the term 'polymer' and 'plastic' interchangeably, polymers are a much larger class of molecules which includes plastics, plus many other materials, such as cellulose, amber, and natural rubber.
The classes of biological molecules may be grouped into the types of polymers they form and the monomers that act as subunits:
Lipids - polymers called diglycerides, triglycerides; monomers are glycerol and fatty acids
Proteins - polymers are known as polypeptides; monomers are amino acids
Nucleic Acids - polymers are DNA and RNA; monomers are nucleotides, which are in turn consist of a nitrogenous base, pentose sugar, and phosphate group
Carbohydrates - polymers are polysaccharides and disaccharides*; monomers are monosaccharides (simple sugars)

Difference Between Starch And Cellulose:
Cellulose and starch are identical polymers that have the same repeat units dependent on glucose and are composed of the same glucose and monomer. There is one major difference between Starch and Cellulose. For starch, glucose repeat units are located in the same direction, and each successive glucose unit is rotated 180 degrees in cellulose.
Cellulose is thicker than sugar, which is water-insoluble. On the other hand, the Starch is less weak than cellulose and can be dissolved in warm water. Cellulose is not suitable for human consumption because mammals will eat starch. Many of the cellulose applications are in rayon substitute, cellophane, etc. Throughout the paper industry as well as in the manufacture of cloths such as linen and cotton, it is used commercially as the main ingredient.
1.Alpha/Beta Types:
Starch: Comprises two types of alpha glucose.
Cellulose: Consists of one type of beta glucose.
2.Connection Type:
Starch: Connected by alpha linkage.
Cellulose: Connected by beta linkage.
3.Digestibility:
Starch: Easily digested.
Cellulose: Difficult to digest.
4.Solubility:
Starch: Dissolves in warm water.
Cellulose: Does not dissolve in water.
5.Strength:
Starch: Weaker than cellulose.
Cellulose: Strong.
6.Crystalline Structure:
Starch: Less crystalline.
Cellulose: More crystalline than starch.
7.Consumption:
Starch: Consumable by humans.
Cellulose: Not consumable by humans.
8.Linkage Type:
Starch: Contains alpha 1,4 linkage.
Cellulose: Contains beta 1,4 linkage.
9.Uses in Plants:
Starch: Used by plants to store energy.
Cellulose: Used by plants to provide structural support.

Biomolecules:
All living organisms are made up of a fundamental unit called the cell. Each cell is made up of organic as well as inorganic compounds. The elemental analysis of the cell constituents shows that a cell comprises carbon, oxygen, hydrogen, nitrogen, phosphorus, etc. Proteins, Carbohydrates, Fats, and Nucleic acids are known as Biomolecules.
Biomolecules are defined as any organic molecule present in a living cell which includes carbohydrates, proteins, fats etc. Each biomolecule is essential for body functions and manufactured within the body. They can vary in nature, type, and structure where some may be straight chains, some may be cyclic rings or both. Also, they can vary in physical properties such as water solubility and melting points.

Types of Biomolecules:
Biomolecules are primarily classified into 4 types, namely:
1.Carbohydrates:
Carbohydrates are macronutrients and are one of the three main ways by which our body obtains its energy. They are called carbohydrates as they comprise carbon, hydrogen and oxygen at their chemical level. Carbohydrates are essential nutrients which include sugars, fibers and starches. They are found in grains, vegetables, fruits and in milk and other dairy products. They are the basic food groups which play an important role in a healthy life.
The food containing carbohydrates are converted into glucose or blood sugar during the process of digestion by the digestive system.
Our body utilizes this sugar as a source of energy for the cells, organs and tissues. The extra amount of energy or sugar is stored in our muscles and liver for further requirement. The term ‘carbohydrate’ is derived from a French term ‘hydrate de carbone‘ meaning ‘hydrate of carbon‘. The general formula of this class of organic compounds is Cn(H2O)n.
We often see bodybuilders and physical trainer drinking whey protein along with milk to build-up metabolism and strength.When it comes to our body, our hair and nails are mostly made of proteins. Basically, proteins are the fundamental building blocks of our body. They are large and complex macromolecules or bio-molecules which perform a major role in the functioning and regulating of our body cells, tissues and other organs in the human body. They are also used in providing strength to our body in producing hormones, enzymes, and other metabolic chemicals. They are also involved in functioning and regulating of our body cells, tissues and organs.
2.Proteins:
Proteins are composed of amino acids, arranged into different groups. These fundamental amino acids sequences are specific and its arrangements are controlled by the DNA. Since our body cannot synthesize these essential amino acids by its own, we should have plenty of protein foods in our everyday diet to keep our body metabolisms stable.
3.Nucleic Acids:
Nucleic acids refer to the genetic material found in the cell that carries all the hereditary information from parents to progeny. There are two types of nucleic acids namely, deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and ribonucleic acid (RNA). The main function of nucleic acid is the transfer of genetic information and synthesis of proteins by processes known as translation and transcription. The monomeric unit of nucleic acids is known as nucleotide and is composed of a nitrogenous base, pentose sugar, and phosphate. The nucleotides are linked by a 3’ and 5’ phosphodiester bond. The nitrogen base attached to the pentose sugar makes the nucleotide distinct. There are 4 major nitrogenous bases found in DNA: adenine, guanine, cytosine, and thymine. In RNA, thymine is replaced by uracil. The DNA structure is described as a double-helix or double-helical structure which is formed by hydrogen bonding between the bases of two antiparallel polynucleotide chains. Overall, the DNA structure looks similar to a twisted ladder.
4.Lipids:
These organic compounds are nonpolar molecules, which are soluble only in nonpolar solvents and insoluble in water because water is a polar molecule. In the human body, these molecules can be synthesized in the liver and are found in oil, butter, whole milk, cheese, fried foods and also in some red meats.
Properties of Lipids:
Lipids are a family of organic compounds, composed of fats and oils. These molecules yield high energy and are responsible for different functions within the human body. Listed below are some important characteristics of Lipids.
Lipids are oily or greasy nonpolar molecules, stored in the adipose tissue of the body.
Lipids are a heterogeneous group of compounds, mainly composed of hydrocarbon chains.
Lipids are energy-rich organic molecules, which provide energy for different life processes.
Lipids are a class of compounds characterised by their solubility in nonpolar solvents and insolubility in water.
Lipids are significant in biological systems as they form a mechanical barrier dividing a cell from the external environment known as the cell membrane.

Enzymology : 
Enzymes (/ˈɛnzaɪmz/) are proteins that act as biological catalysts by accelerating chemical reactions. The molecules upon which enzymes may act are called substrates, and the enzyme converts the substrates into different molecules known as products. Almost all metabolic processes in the cell need enzyme catalysis in order to occur at rates fast enough to sustain life.[1]: 8.1  Metabolic pathways depend upon enzymes to catalyze individual steps. The study of enzymes is called enzymology and the field of pseudoenzyme analysis recognizes that during evolution, some enzymes have lost the ability to carry out biological catalysis, which is often reflected in their amino acid sequences.
Like all catalysts, enzymes increase the reaction rate by lowering its activation energy. Some enzymes can make their conversion of substrate to product occur many millions of times faster. An extreme example is orotidine 5'-phosphate decarboxylase, which allows a reaction that would otherwise take millions of years to occur in milliseconds.[5][6] Chemically, enzymes are like any catalyst and are not consumed in chemical reactions, nor do they alter the equilibrium of a reaction. Enzymes differ from most other catalysts by being much more specific. Enzyme activity can be affected by other molecules: inhibitors are molecules that decrease enzyme activity, and activators are molecules that increase activity. Many therapeutic drugs and poisons are enzyme inhibitors. An enzyme's activity decreases markedly outside its optimal temperature and pH, and many enzymes are (permanently) denatured when exposed to excessive heat, losing their structure and catalytic properties.
Some enzymes are used commercially, for example, in the synthesis of antibiotics. Some household products use enzymes to speed up chemical reactions: enzymes in biological washing powders break down protein, starch or fat stains on clothes.

Examples of Enzymes:
Following are some of the examples of enzymes:
Beverages: Alcoholic beverages generated by fermentation vary a lot based on many factors. Based on the type of the plant’s product, which is to be used and the type of enzyme applied, the fermented product varies. For example, grapes, honey, hops, wheat, cassava roots, and potatoes depending upon the materials available. Beer, wines and other drinks are produced from plant fermentation.
Food Products: Bread can be considered as the finest example of fermentation in our everyday life. A small proportion of yeast and sugar is mixed with the batter for making bread. Then one can observe that the bread gets puffed up as a result of fermentation of the sugar by the enzyme action in yeast, which leads to the formation of carbon dioxide gas. This process gives the texture to the bread, which would be missing in the absence of the fermentation process.
Drug Action: Enzyme action can be inhibited or promoted by the use of drugs which tend to work around the active sites of enzymes.

Types of enzymes: 
1.Oxidoreductases: These catalyze oxidation and reduction reactions, e.g. pyruvate dehydrogenase, catalysing the oxidation of pyruvate to acetyl coenzyme A.
2.Transferases: These catalyze transferring of the chemical group from one to another compound. An example is a transaminase, which transfers an amino group from one molecule to another.
3.Hydrolases: They catalyze the hydrolysis of a bond. For example, the enzyme pepsin hydrolyzes peptide bonds in proteins.
4.Lyases: These catalyze the breakage of bonds without catalysis, e.g. aldolase (an enzyme in glycolysis) catalyzes the splitting of fructose-1, 6-bisphosphate to glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate and dihydroxyacetone phosphate.
5.Isomerases: They catalyze the formation of an isomer of a compound. Example: phosphoglucomutase catalyzes the conversion of glucose-1-phosphate to glucose-6-phosphate (phosphate group is transferred from one to another position in the same compound) in glycogenolysis (glycogen is converted to glucose for energy to be released quickly).
6.Ligases: Ligases catalyze the association of two molecules. For example, DNA ligase catalyzes the joining of two fragments of DNA by forming a phosphodiester bond.

There are three kinds of cofactors present in enzymes:
Prosthetic groups: These are cofactors tightly bound to an enzyme at all times. FAD (flavin adenine dinucleotide) is a prosthetic group present in many enzymes.
Coenzyme: A coenzyme binds to an enzyme only during catalysis. At all other times, it is detached from the enzyme. NAD is a common coenzyme.
Metal ions: For the catalysis of certain enzymes, a metal ion is required at the active site to form coordinate bonds. Zinc is a metal ion cofactor used by a number of enzymes.

Functions of Enzymes:
1.The enzymes perform a number of functions in our bodies. These include-
2.Enzymes help in signal transduction. The most common enzyme used in the process includes protein kinase that catalyzes the phosphorylation of proteins.
3.They break down large molecules into smaller substances that can be easily absorbed by the body.
4.They help in generating energy in the body. ATP synthase is the enzyme involved in the synthesis of energy.
5.Enzymes are responsible for the movement of ions across the plasma membrane.
6.Enzymes perform a number of biochemical reactions, including oxidation, reduction, hydrolysis, etc. to eliminate the non-nutritive substances from the body.
7.They function to reorganize the internal structure of the cell to regulate cellular activities.

Action and Nature of Enzymes:
Once substrate (S) binds to this active site, they form a complex (intermediate-ES) which then produces the product (P) and the enzyme (E). The substrate which gets attached to the enzyme has a specific structure and that can only fit in a particular enzyme. Hence, by providing a surface for the substrate, an enzyme slows down the activation energy of the reaction. The intermediate state where the substrate binds to the enzyme is called the transition state. By breaking and making the bonds, the substrate binds to the enzyme (remains unchanged), which converts into the product and later splits into product and enzyme. The free enzymes then bind to other substrates and the catalytic cycle continues until the reaction completes.
The enzyme action basically happens in two steps:
Step1: Combining of enzyme and the reactant/substrate.
E+S → [ES]
Step 2: Disintegration of the complex molecule to give the product.
[ES]→E+P
Thus, the whole catalyst action of enzymes is summarized as:
E + S → [ES] → [EP] → E + P

Enzyme-Substrate Interactions:
Enzymes are biocatalysts, which are high molecular weight proteinous compounds. It enhances the reactions which occur in the body during various life processes. It helps the substrate by providing the surface for the reaction to occur. The enzyme comprises hollow spaces occupying groups such as -SH, -COOH, and others on the outer surface. The substrate which has an opposite charge of the enzyme fits into these spaces, just like a key fits into a lock. This substrate binding site is called the active site of an enzyme (E).
The favourable model of enzyme-substrate interaction is called the induced-fit model. This model states that the interaction between substrate and enzyme is weak, and these weak interactions induce conformational changes rapidly and strengthen binding and bring catalytic sites close enough to substrate bonds.
There are four possible major mechanisms of catalysis:
-Catalysis by Bond Strain: The induced structural rearrangements in this type of catalysis produce strained substrate bonds that attain transition state more easily. The new conformation forces substrate atoms and catalytic groups like aspartate into conformations that strain substrate bonds.
-Covalent Catalysis: The substrate is oriented to active place on the enzymes in such a manner that a covalent intermediate develops between the enzyme and the substrate, in catalysis that occurs by covalent mechanisms. The best example of this involves proteolysis by serine proteases that have both digestive enzymes and various enzymes of the blood clotting cascade. These proteases possess an active site serine whose R group hydroxyl generates a covalent bond with a carbonyl carbon of a peptide bond and results in the hydrolysis of the peptide bond.
-Catalysis Involving Acids and Bases: Other mechanisms add to the completion of catalytic events which are launched by strain mechanisms such as the usage of glutamate as a general acid catalyst.
-Catalysis by Orientation and Proximity: Enzyme-substrate interactions induce reactive groups into proximity with one another. Also, groups like aspartate are chemically reactive, and their proximity towards the substrate favours their involvement in catalysis.

The mechanism of enzyme action:
Enzymes are proteins that speed up chemical reactions in the body. The mechanism of enzyme action is as follows: 
1.The enzyme and the substrate are in the same area. Some situations have more than one substrate molecule that the enzyme will change.
2.The enzyme grabs on to the substrate at a special area called the active site. The combination is called the enzyme/substrate complex. Enzymes are very, very specific and don't just grab on to any molecule. The active site is a specially shaped area of the enzyme that fits around the substrate. The active site is like the grasping claw of the robot on the assembly line. It can only pick up one or two parts.
3.A process called catalysis happens. Catalysis is when the substrate is changed. It could be broken down or combined with another molecule to make something new. It will break or build chemical bonds. When done, you will have the enzyme/products complex.
4.The enzyme releases the product. When the enzyme lets go, it returns to its original shape. It is then ready to work on another molecule of substrate.
The combination of an enzyme and its substrates is called the enzyme–substrate complex.
Enzymes are biological catalysts. They reduce activation energy, allowing reactions to proceed in a desired direction. Enzymes are essential for digestion, liver function, and more. 

Mechanism of Enzyme Reaction:
Any two molecules have to collide for the reaction to occur along with the right orientation and a sufficient amount of energy. The energy between these molecule. needs to overcome the barrier in the reaction. This energy is called activation energ
Enzymes are said to possess an active site. The active site is a part of the molecule has a definite shape and the functional group for the binding of reactant molecules The molecule that binds to the enzyme is referred to as the substrate group. The substrate and the enzyme form an intermediate reaction with low activation energ without any catalysts.
- reactant (1) + reactant(2) → product 
- reactant(1) + enzyme → intermediate 
- intermediate + reactant (2) → product + enzyme
The basic mechanism of enzyme action is to catalyze the chemical reactions, which begins with the binding of the substrate with the active site of the enzyme. This active site is a specific area that combines with the substrate

Active site of an enzyme:
The enzyme’s active site is a cleft or a pocket within the enzyme where the substrate molecule binds and undergoes chemical reactions to be converted into the product.

Lock and key hypothesis of enzymes: 
Enzymes are very specific and it was suggested by Fischer in 1890 that this was because the enzyme had a particular shape into which the substrate or substrates fit exactly.This is often referred as Lock and Key hypothesis.
Lock and Key model:
-According to this model, shape of active site of enzyme is complementary to the shape of substrate molecules. Ie. the substrate is like a key whose shape is complementary to the enzyme which is supposed to be lock and they fit perfectly.
-Enzymes catalyze only those substrates which fit perfectly on the active site of that enzyme
-Most enzymes are far larger than the substrates molecules that act on and the active site is usually a very small portion of the enzyme, between 3 and 12 amino acids. The remaining amino acids which make the bulk of the enzyme, function to maintain the correct globular shape of the enzyme.
-Once the product is formed, they no longer fit into the active site and escape into surrounding medium.
-According to lock and key model, enzymes behave as rigid molecules. However, most enzymes are globular and are flexible with varying shape.

INDUCED FIT MODEL of Enzymes:
-In 1959, Koshland suggested a modification to the ‘Lock and Key’ hypothesis which is known as ‘Induced fit’ hypothesis.
-Working from evidence that suggested that some enzymes and their active site are more flexible. To this, he proposed that the active site can modify its shape as the substrate interact with the enzyme.
-The amino acids which make up the active site are moulded into precise shape which enable the enzyme to perform its catalytic function most efficiently.
-For instance, a suitable analogy to describe Induced fit model would be that of a hand changing the shape of the glove as the individual put on the glove. Therefore in this case, glove is the active site of enzyme and the hand is substrate.
-However, in some cases, the substrate molecules changes slightly as it enters the active site before binding.
The substrate gets attached to the enzyme which has a specific structure that can only be fitted in a particular enzyme. In Induced fit, the active site is not exactly complementary to the substrate but changes shape in the presence of a specific substrate to become complementary and initiate the reaction. When a substrate molecule interacts with an enzyme, if its composition is specifically correct, the shape of the enzyme’s Active site will change so that the substrate fits into it and an Enzyme – Substrate complex can be formed. After the reaction, an Enzyme-Product Complex is formed. The enzyme slows down the activation energy of the reaction by providing a surface to the substrate. The intermediate state where the substrate binds with the enzyme is called the transition state. The enzyme and substrate form bonds and then breaks them, which results in a product and later they split into product and enzyme. The enzymes then bind to other substrates the cycle continues till the reaction is completed. When the substrate (S) binds to its active site with the enzyme (E), a complex (intermediate ES) is developed which produces the product (P) and the enzyme. 
The steps included in enzyme actions are:
Step 1: The enzyme and substrate combine and result in an intermediate substrate.
Step 2: The detachment of complex molecules gives the product and enzyme. 
The entire catalyst reaction of enzymes can be expressed as:
E  +  S  —>  (ES)  —>   E  +  P

Advantages of Induced Fit Model over Lock and Key Model:
This hypothesis provides the following two hypotheses-
-It illustrates the wide specificity of enzymes. For example, a variety of lipids can bind to lipase enzymes. for substrates.
-It outlines the possible causes of catalysis, i.e., the bonds in the substrate are stressed by the conformational change, boosting reactivity.

Proteins:
Proteins are known as the building blocks of life because they are the most abundant molecules present in the body and form about 60% of the dry weight of cells.
They make up the majority of the cells in all living things. Aside from cells, proteins make up the majority of the body’s structural, regulatory, and enzyme components. They are therefore crucial for an individual’s growth and development.
Food like eggs, pulses, milk and other milk products form the major high-protein foods for the body.

Classification of Proteins:
Based on the molecular shape, proteins can be classified into two types.
1. Fibrous Proteins:
When the polypeptide chains run parallel and are held together by hydrogen and disulfide bonds, then the fiber-like structure is formed. Such proteins are generally insoluble in water. These are water-insoluble proteins.
Example – keratin (present in hair, wool, and silk) and myosin (present in muscles), etc.
2. Globular Proteins:
This structure results when the chains of polypeptides coil around to give a spherical shape. These are usually soluble in water.
Example – Insulin and albumins are common examples of globular proteins.

Structure of protein:
Protein structure is defined as a polymer of amino acids joined by peptide bonds. Protein structures are made by condensation of amino acids forming peptide bonds. The sequence of amino acids in a protein is called its primary structure. The secondary structure is determined by the dihedral angles of the peptide bonds, the tertiary structure by the folding of protein chains in space. Association of folded polypeptide molecules to complex functional proteins results in quaternary structure.
A polymeric chain of amino acid residues constitutes proteins. A protein’s structure is primarily made up of long chains of amino acids. The arrangement and placement of amino acids give proteins certain characteristics. All amino acid molecules contain an amino (-NH2) and a carboxyl (-COOH) functional group. Hence, the name “Amino-Acid”.
Polypeptide chains are synthesized by linking together amino acids. A protein is created when one or more of these chains fold in a specific way. Methane is substituted by amino acids, with hydrogen, amino groups, carboxyl groups, and a variable R- group filling the first three valencies of the – alpha carbon.
There are many sorts of amino acids depending on the R-group, and a polypeptide chain contains 20 of them. The final structure and purpose of proteins are determined by all these characteristics of amino acids.
The structure of the protein is classified at 4 levels:-
1.Primary – The primary structure of a protein is the linear polypeptide chain formed by the amino acids in a particular sequence. Changing the position of even a single amino acid will result in a different chain and hence a different protein.
2.Secondary – The secondary structure of a protein is formed by hydrogen bonding in the polypeptide chain. These bonds cause the chain to fold and coil in two different conformations known as the α-helix or β-pleated sheets. The α-helix is like a single spiral and is formed by hydrogen bonding between every fourth amino acid. The β-pleated sheet is formed by hydrogen bonding between two or more adjacent polypeptide chains.
3.Tertiary – The tertiary structure is the final 3-dimensional shape acquired by the polypeptide chains under the attractive and repulsive forces of the different R-groups of each amino acid. This is a coiled structure that is very necessary for protein functions.
4.Quaternary – This structure is exhibited only by those proteins which have multiple polypeptide chains combined to form a large complex. The individual chains are then called subunits.

Rules of Protein Structure:
1.The type determines the function of a protein.
2.A protein’s shape is determined by its primary structure (the amino acid sequence).
3.The amino acid sequence within a protein is determined by the encoding sequence of nucleotides in the gene (DNA).

Functions of Proteins:
The body uses proteins for a variety of purposes, and their structure determines how they work. Several notable functions include:
-Digestion – The digestive enzymes, which are primarily proteinaceous in origin, carry out digestion.
-Movement – Muscles include a protein called myosin, which helps muscles contract, allowing for movement.
-Structure and Support – The structural protein known as keratin is what gives humans and other animals hair, nails, and horns.
-Cellular communication – Through receptors on their surface, cells can communicate with other cells and the outside world. These receptors are made of proteins.
-Act as a messenger – These proteins serve as chemical messengers that facilitate communication among cells, tissues, and organs.

Exothermic and endothermic versus endergonic and exergoinc reactions:
In biology, the concepts of exothermic and endothermic reactions are closely related to the terms endergonic and exergonic, but they have some nuanced differences in their application:
Exothermic Reaction (in Biology):
In biology, exothermic reactions typically refer to biochemical processes that release heat or energy.
For example, the process of cellular respiration involves the breakdown of glucose to release energy, and it's considered exothermic.
Endothermic Reaction (in Biology):
Endothermic reactions in biology are biochemical processes that absorb heat or energy from their surroundings.
For instance, photosynthesis is an endothermic process as it requires energy from sunlight to convert carbon dioxide and water into glucose.
Endergonic Reaction (in Biology):
Endergonic reactions in biology are those that require an input of energy to proceed. These reactions are not necessarily associated with heat exchange.
An example of an endergonic process in biology is the synthesis of ATP (adenosine triphosphate), which requires energy to combine adenosine diphosphate (ADP) and inorganic phosphate (Pi) to form ATP.
Exergonic Reaction (in Biology):
Exergonic reactions in biology release free energy and are often associated with processes that break down molecules to release energy.
Cellular respiration, which involves the breakdown of glucose to produce energy, is considered an exergonic process.
The key difference is that exothermic and endothermic reactions primarily refer to heat exchange in biological processes, while endergonic and exergonic reactions focus on the net energy changes, especially in terms of free energy (ΔG). Endergonic reactions require an input of energy, whereas exergonic reactions release energy, regardless of heat exchange.
(Gibbs free energy, also known as the Gibbs function, Gibbs energy, or free enthalpy, is a quantity that is used to measure the maximum amount of work done in a thermodynamic system when the temperature and pressure are kept constant. Gibbs free energy is denoted by the symbol 'G'.)

DNA:
Nucleic acids are the organic materials present in all organisms in the form of DNA or RNA. These nucleic acids are formed by the combination of nitrogenous bases, sugar molecules and phosphate groups that are linked by different bonds in a series of sequences. The DNA structure defines the basic genetic makeup of our body. In fact, it defines the genetic makeup of nearly all life on earth.
“DNA is a group of molecules that is responsible for carrying and transmitting the hereditary materials or the genetic instructions from parents to offsprings.”
This is also true for viruses, as most of these entities have either RNA or DNA as their genetic material. For instance, some viruses may have RNA as their genetic material, while others have DNA as the genetic material. The Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) contains RNA, which is then converted into DNA after attaching itself to the host cell.
Apart from being responsible for the inheritance of genetic information in all living beings, DNA also plays a crucial role in the production of proteins. Nuclear DNA is the DNA contained within the nucleus of every cell in a eukaryotic organism. It codes for the majority of the organism’s genomes while the mitochondrial DNA and plastid DNA handles the rest. The DNA present in the mitochondria of the cell is termed mitochondrial DNA. It is inherited from the mother to the child. In humans, there are approximately 16,000 base pairs of mitochondrial DNA. Similarly, plastids have their own DNA, and they play an essential role in photosynthesis.

Full-Form of DNA:
DNA is known as Deoxyribonucleic Acid. It is an organic compound that has a unique molecular structure. It is found in all prokaryotic cells and eukaryotic cells.

Discovery of DNA:
DNA was first recognized and identified by the Swiss biologist Johannes Friedrich Miescher in 1869 during his research on white blood cells. The double helix structure of a DNA molecule was later discovered through the experimental data by James Watson and Francis Crick. Finally, it was proved that DNA is responsible for storing genetic information in living organisms.

DNA Types
There are three different DNA types:
1.A-DNA: It is a right-handed double helix similar to the B-DNA form. Dehydrated DNA takes an A form that protects the DNA during extreme conditions such as desiccation. Protein binding also removes the solvent from DNA, and the DNA takes an A form.
2.B-DNA: This is the most common DNA conformation and is a right-handed helix. The majority of DNA has a B type conformation under normal physiological conditions.
3.Z-DNA: Z-DNA is a left-handed DNA where the double helix winds to the left in a zig-zag pattern. It was discovered by Andres Wang and Alexander Rich. It is found ahead of the start site of a gene and hence, is believed to play some role in gene regulation.

DNA Structure:
DNA comprises a sugar-phosphate backbone and the nucleotide bases (guanine, cytosine, adenine and thymine).
The DNA structure can be thought of as a twisted ladder. This structure is described as a double-helix, as illustrated in the figure above. It is a nucleic acid, and all nucleic acids are made up of nucleotides. The DNA molecule is composed of units called nucleotides, and each nucleotide is composed of three different components such as sugar, phosphate groups and nitrogen bases. 
The basic building blocks of DNA are nucleotides, which are composed of a sugar group, a phosphate group, and a nitrogen base. The sugar and phosphate groups link the nucleotides together to form each strand of DNA. Adenine (A), Thymine (T), Guanine (G)  and Cytosine (C) are four types of nitrogen bases.
These 4 Nitrogenous bases pair together in the following way: A with T, and C with G. These base pairs are essential for the DNA’s double helix structure, which resembles a twisted ladder.
The order of the nitrogenous bases determines the genetic code or the DNA’s instructions.
Among the three components of DNA structure, sugar is the one which forms the backbone of the DNA molecule. It is also called deoxyribose. The nitrogenous bases of the opposite strands form hydrogen bonds, forming a ladder-like structure.
The DNA molecule consists of 4 nitrogen bases, namely adenine (A), thymine (T), cytosine (C) and Guanine (G), which ultimately form the structure of a nucleotide. The A and G are purines, and the C and T are pyrimidines.
The two strands of DNA run in opposite directions. These strands are held together by the hydrogen bond that is present between the two complementary bases. The strands are helically twisted, where each strand forms a right-handed coil, and ten nucleotides make up a single turn.
The pitch of each helix is 3.4 nm. Hence, the distance between two consecutive base pairs (i.e., hydrogen-bonded bases of the opposite strands) is 0.34 nm.
The DNA coils up, forming chromosomes, and each chromosome has a single molecule of DNA in it. Overall, human beings have around twenty-three pairs of chromosomes in the nucleus of cells. DNA also plays an essential role in the process of cell division.
The genetic material in most organisms is DNA or Deoxyribonucleic acid; whereas in some viruses, it is RNA or Ribonucleic acid. A DNA molecule consists of two polynucleotide chains i.e. chains with multiple nucleotides. Let’s understand the structure of this chain in detail.
Structure Of Polynucleotide Chain-
A nucleotide is made of the following components:
1.Pentose sugar – A pentose sugar is a 5-carbon sugar. In case of DNA, this sugar is deoxyribose whereas, in RNA, it is ribose.
2.Phosphate group.
3.Nitrogenous base – These can be of two types – Purines and Pyrimidines. Purines include Adenine and Guanine whereas pyrimidines include Cytosine and Thymine. In RNA, thymine is replaced by Uracil.
-Nitrogenous base + pentose sugar (via N-glycosidic linkage) = Nucleoside.
-Nucleoside + phosphate group (via phosphoester linkage) = Nucleotide.
-Nucleotide + Nucleotide (via 3′-5′ phosphodiester linkage) = Dinucleotide.
-Many nucleotides linked together = Polynucleotide.
A polynucleotide has a free phosphate group at the 5′ end of the sugar and this is called the 5′ end. Similarly, the sugar also has a free 3′-OH group at the other end of the polynucleotide which is called the 3′ end. The backbone of a polynucleotide chain consists of pentose sugars and phosphate groups; whereas the nitrogenous bases project out of this backbone.
Double Helix Structure-
DNA is a long polymer and therefore, difficult to isolate from cells in an intact form. This is why it is difficult to study its structure. However, in 1953, James Watson and Francis revealed the ‘double helix’ model of the structure of DNA, based on X-ray diffraction data from Maurice Wilkins and Rosalind Franklin.
This model also reveals a unique property of polynucleotide chains – Base pairing. It refers to the hydrogen bonds that connect the nitrogen bases on opposite DNA strands. This pairing gives rise to complementary strands i.e. if you know the sequence of bases on one strand, you can predict the bases on the other strand. Additionally, if each DNA strand acts as a template for synthesis (parent) of a new strand, then the new double-stranded DNA (daughters) produced are identical to the parental DNA strand.
Salient Features of DNA -Helix:
The structure consists of two polynucleotide chains where the sugar and phosphate group form the backbone of the structure and the nitrogenous bases project inside the helix.
The two polynucleotide chains have anti-parallel polarity i.e. if one strand has 5′ → 3′ polarity, on the other hand the other strand has 3′ → 5′ polarity.
The bases on the opposite strands are connected through hydrogen bonds that form base pairs (bp). Adenine always binds to thymine with two hydrogen bonds from the opposite strand and the other way round. Guanine bonds with cytosine with three hydrogen bonds from the opposite strand and vice-versa. subsequently, a purine always pairs with a pyrimidine on the other strand, giving rise to a uniform distance between the two strands of the double helix.
The two strands coil in a right-handed fashion. Each turn of the helix is 3.4nm (or 34 Angstrom units) that consist of 10 nucleotides. These nucleotides are placed at a distance of 0.34nm (or 3.4 Angstrom units).
The presence of the base pairs makes the helix more stable as these base pairs that are stacked over one another and the hydrogen bonds hold the bases together.


Energy Currency of the Cell:
All living things including plants, animals, birds, insects, humans need energy for the proper functioning of cells, tissues and other organ systems. As we are aware that green plants, obtain their energy from the sunlight, and animals get their energy by feeding on these plants. Energy acts as a source of fuel. We, humans, gain energy from the food we eat, but how are the energy produced and stored in our body.
What is ATP-Adenosine Triphosphate?
ATP – Adenosine triphosphate is called the energy currency of the cell.
It is the organic compound composed of the phosphate groups, adenine, and the sugar ribose. These molecules provide energy for various biochemical processes in the body. Therefore, it is called “Energy Currency of the Cell”. These ATP molecules are synthesized by Mitochondria, therefore it is called powerhouse of the cell.
The ATP molecule was discovered in the year 1929 by German chemist Karl Lohmann. Later in the year 1948, Scottish biochemist Alexander Todd was the first person to synthesized the ATP molecule.
ATP – the energy-carrying molecules are found in the cells of all living things. These organic molecules function by capturing the chemical energy obtained from the digested food molecules and are later released for different cellular processes.

This is how Energy Produced by the ATP molecules:
The three phosphate groups present in this ATP molecule are called high energy bonds as they are involved in the liberation of a huge amount of energy when they are broken. This molecule provides energy for various life processes without which life cannot exist.
It is used by various enzymes and structural proteins in cellular processes like biosynthetic reactions, cell divisions, etc. This “energy currency of the cell” is produced during cellular respiration where a digested simple molecule of food is utilized.
Once after the energy is produced by the ATP molecules, they are stored in its bonds which are
later utilized by the cells by breaking the bonds whenever required

Functions of ATP:
The ATP is used for various cellular functions, including transportation of different molecules across cell membranes.
Other functions of ATP include supplying the energy required for the muscle contraction, circulation of blood, locomotion and various body movements.
A significant role of ATP apart from energy production includes: synthesizing the multi- thousand types of macromolecules that the cell requires for their survival. ATP molecule is also used as a switch to control chemical reactions and to send messages.

Glycolysis:
Glycolysis is the process in which glucose is broken down to produce energy. It produces two molecules of pyruvate, ATP, NADH and water. The process takes place in the cytoplasm of a cell and does not require oxygen. It occurs in both aerobic and anaerobic organisms.
Step 1: A phosphate group is added to glucose in the cell cytoplasm, by the action of enzyme hexokinase. In this, a phosphate group is transferred from ATP to glucose forming glucose,6-phosphate. 
Step 2: Glucose-6-phosphate is isomerised into fructose,6-phosphate by the enzyme phosphoglucomutase.
Step 3: The other ATP molecule transfers a phosphate group to fructose 6-phosphate and converts it into fructose 1,6-bisphosphate by the action of the enzyme phosphofructokinase.
Step 4: The enzyme aldolase converts fructose 1,6-bisphosphate into glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate and dihydroxyacetone phosphate, which are isomers of each other.
Step 5: Triose-phosphate isomerase converts dihydroxyacetone phosphate into glyceraldehyde 3- phosphate which is the substrate in the successive step of glycolysis.
Step 6: This step undergoes two reactions:
-The enzyme glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate dehydrogenase transfers 1 hydrogen molecule from glyceraldehyde phosphate to nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide to form NADH + H+.
-Glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate dehydrogenase adds a phosphate to the oxidised glyceraldehyde phosphate to form 1,3-bisphosphoglycerate.
Step 7: Phosphate is transferred from 1,3-bisphosphoglycerate to ADP to form ATP with the help of phosphoglycerokinase. Thus two molecules of phosphoglycerate and ATP are obtained at the end of this reaction.
Step 8: The phosphate of both the phosphoglycerate molecules is relocated from the third to the second carbon to yield two molecules of 2-phosphoglycerate by the enzyme phosphoglyceromutase.
Step 9: The enzyme enolase removes a water molecule from 2-phosphoglycerate to form phosphoenolpyruvate.
Step 10: A phosphate from phosphoenolpyruvate is transferred to ADP to form pyruvate and ATP by the action of pyruvate kinase. Two molecules of pyruvate and ATP are obtained as the end products.

Krebs cycle/TCA cycle:
The Krebs cycle or TCA cycle (tricarboxylic acid cycle) or Citric acid cycle is a series of enzyme catalysed reactions occurring in the mitochondrial matrix, where acetyl-CoA is oxidised to form carbon dioxide and coenzymes are reduced, which generate ATP in the electron transport chain.

Krebs Cycle Steps:
It is an eight-step process. Krebs cycle or TCA cycle takes place in the matrix of mitochondria under aerobic condition.
Step 1: The first step is the condensation of acetyl CoA with 4-carbon compound oxaloacetate to form 6C citrate, coenzyme A is released. The reaction is catalysed by citrate synthase.
Step 2: Citrate is converted to its isomer, isocitrate. The enzyme aconitase catalyses this reaction.
Step 3: Isocitrate undergoes dehydrogenation and decarboxylation to form 5C 𝝰 -ketoglutarate. A molecular form of CO2 is released. Isocitrate dehydrogenase catalyses the reaction. It is an NAD+ dependent enzyme. NAD+ is converted to NADH.
Step 4: 𝝰 -ketoglutarate undergoes oxidative decarboxylation to form succinyl CoA, a 4C compound. The reaction is catalyzed by the 𝝰 -ketoglutarate dehydrogenase enzyme complex. One molecule of CO2 is released and NAD+ is converted to NADH.
Step 5: Succinyl CoA forms succinate. The enzyme succinyl CoA synthetase catalyses the reaction. This is coupled with substrate-level phosphorylation of GDP to get GTP. GTP transfers its phosphate to ADP forming ATP.
Step 6: Succinate is oxidised by the enzyme succinate dehydrogenase to fumarate. In the process, FAD is converted to FADH2.
Step 7: Fumarate gets converted to malate by the addition of one H2O. The enzyme catalysing this reaction is fumarase.
Step 8: Malate is dehydrogenated to form oxaloacetate, which combines with another molecule of acetyl CoA and starts the new cycle. Hydrogens removed, get transferred to NAD+ forming NADH. Malate dehydrogenase catalyses the reaction.

Photosynthesis Process:
The actual process occurs during the day and two inter-related phases are involved in the process:
1. Light Dependent Reaction: This reaction requires sunlight to produce energy molecules (ATP & NADPH). Moreover, photosynthesis increases with more photons (light) and consequently, more energy molecules are produced.
2. Light Independent Reaction: Essentially, the light-independent reaction uses the energy molecules produced by the light-dependent reaction to produce even more energy molecules.

Process of Photosynthesis Step by Step:
- The sunlight is absorbed by the chlorophyll in the leaves of the plants. Carbon dioxide enters the plant through structures called the stomata, which are usually found on the underside of the leaves. Water is absorbed through the roots of the plant.
- The light-dependent reaction occurs during the day. At this stage, water is spilt into its elements – oxygen and hydrogen ions. Then, the ions go through a series of electron carriers, eventually leading to the accumulation of hydrogen ions. As electrons get transferred from one electron carrier to another, energy is released. In this case, ATP & NADPH are released.
- The light Independent reaction uses the energy produced during light depending on the reaction to transform carbon dioxide into glucose. The transformation from carbon dioxide to glucose requires a few reactions. The same molecule produces glucose during this process.
- The lower parts of the leaves have rather “spaced out” cells. This structure permits carbon dioxide to permeate into other parts of the leaves, thereby facilitating the release of oxygen.

Thermodynamics as Applied to Biological Systems:
Definition: Thermodynamics is the study of energy and its transformations. In biological systems, thermodynamics governs the energy changes associated with biochemical reactions and processes.
First Law of Thermodynamics: States that energy cannot be created or destroyed, only transformed from one form to another. In biological systems, this law emphasizes the conservation of energy during metabolic processes.
Second Law of Thermodynamics: Describes the tendency of systems to move towards increased entropy or disorder. In biological systems, it underscores the directionality of metabolic pathways and the spontaneous nature of certain biochemical reactions.
Entropy and Free Energy: Entropy is a measure of the randomness or disorder in a system. Free energy, in the context of biological systems, represents the energy available to do work. Processes that increase entropy are favored, while those that decrease free energy require an input of energy.

Exothermic and Endothermic vs. Endergonic and Exergonic Reactions:
Exothermic and Endothermic Reactions:
Exothermic Reaction: Releases energy to the surroundings in the form of heat. Combustion is a classic example.
Endothermic Reaction: Absorbs energy from the surroundings, often resulting in a decrease in temperature. Photosynthesis is an example.
Endergonic and Exergonic Reactions:
Endergonic Reaction: Absorbs energy, and the products have higher potential energy than the reactants. These reactions require an input of energy.
Exergonic Reaction: Releases energy, and the products have lower potential energy than the reactants. These reactions release energy that can be used for cellular work.
Biological Examples:
Exothermic: Cellular respiration, where glucose is oxidized to produce energy.
Endothermic: Photosynthesis, where energy from sunlight is absorbed to synthesize glucose.
Cellular Implications:
Exergonic reactions provide energy for cellular work.
Endergonic reactions require energy input and often involve energy-storing processes such as ATP synthesis.
Role in Metabolism: Metabolic pathways involve both endergonic and exergonic reactions. Endergonic reactions often require energy input, provided by exergonic reactions, creating a balance in cellular energy transactions.
Coupling of Reactions: Biological systems often couple endergonic reactions (energy-consuming) with exergonic reactions (energy-releasing) to drive cellular processes. ATP (adenosine triphosphate) is a key mediator in this energy coupling.

Spontaneity:
Spontaneous Reactions:
Spontaneous reactions occur without external intervention and tend to move towards equilibrium.
It does not imply the speed of the reaction; some spontaneous reactions may occur slowly.
Gibbs Free Energy (ΔG) and Spontaneity:
For a reaction to be spontaneous, ΔG must be negative.
ΔG = ΔH - TΔS, where ΔH is the enthalpy change, T is temperature, and ΔS is the entropy change.
Negative ΔG and Equilibrium:
A negative ΔG indicates that the reaction releases free energy, and the system moves towards a more stable state.
At equilibrium, ΔG is zero, and the system is in a state of minimum free energy.
Biological Examples:
Cellular respiration is a spontaneous process, releasing energy for cellular activities.
Photosynthesis, though endergonic, becomes spontaneous when coupled with exergonic reactions in cellular respiration.

Concept of Keq and its Relation to Standard Free Energy:
Definition of Keq: Keq, or the equilibrium constant, is a ratio of the concentrations of products to reactants at equilibrium for a given chemical reaction. It provides insight into the position of equilibrium.
Standard Free Energy (ΔG°): Standard free energy change (ΔG°) is the change in free energy under standard conditions (1 M concentration, 1 atm pressure, 25°C). ΔG° is related to Keq by the equation ΔG° = -RT ln(Keq), where R is the gas constant and T is the temperature in Kelvin.
Relation to Spontaneity: If ΔG° is negative, the reaction is exergonic and spontaneous in the forward direction. If ΔG° is positive, the reaction is endergonic and requires an input of energy to proceed spontaneously.
Keq and Equilibrium: When Keq is much greater than 1, the reaction favors the formation of products at equilibrium. Conversely, when Keq is much less than 1, the reaction favors the formation of reactants at equilibrium.

ATP as an Energy Currency:
Adenosine Triphosphate (ATP) Overview:
ATP is a nucleotide that serves as the primary energy currency in cells. It consists of an adenine base, a ribose sugar, and three phosphate groups.
Energy Storage in ATP: The high-energy phosphate bonds in ATP store energy. When these bonds are hydrolyzed, ATP is converted to adenosine diphosphate (ADP) and inorganic phosphate (Pi), releasing energy.
Role in Cellular Work: ATP powers cellular processes such as mechanical work (muscle contraction), transport work (active transport of ions), and chemical work (biosynthesis) by providing energy through hydrolysis reactions.
Regeneration of ATP: Cells constantly regenerate ATP through processes like cellular respiration (oxidative phosphorylation), where energy derived from nutrients is used to reattach a phosphate group to ADP.

Breakdown of Glucose to CO2 + H2O and Synthesis of Glucose from CO2 and H2O:
Glycolysis and Krebs Cycle (Glucose Breakdown):
Glycolysis: Occurs in the cytoplasm and breaks down glucose into pyruvate, producing ATP and NADH.
Krebs Cycle (Citric Acid Cycle): Takes place in the mitochondria, oxidizing pyruvate to produce CO2, ATP, NADH, and FADH2.
Photosynthesis (Synthesis of Glucose):
Photosynthesis occurs in chloroplasts and involves two main stages: the light-dependent reactions and the light-independent reactions (Calvin cycle).
Carbon dioxide (CO2) and water (H2O) are used to produce glucose, with the release of oxygen (O2) during the process.

Energy Yielding and Consuming Reactions:
Energy-Yielding Reactions: In glycolysis and the Krebs cycle, the breakdown of glucose releases energy, captured in the form of ATP and reduced coenzymes (NADH, FADH2).
Energy-Consuming Reactions: In photosynthesis, energy from sunlight is used to convert carbon dioxide and water into glucose, consuming energy in the process.
Central Role of ATP: ATP plays a central role in both processes. In glycolysis and the Krebs cycle, ATP is produced through substrate-level phosphorylation. In photosynthesis, ATP is generated through the phosphorylation of ADP using the energy from light.

Concept of Energy:
Definition of Energy: Energy is the capacity to do work or cause a change. In biological systems, energy is essential for the performance of cellular work, such as the synthesis of macromolecules, transport of substances, and mechanical activities.
Forms of Energy: Energy exists in various forms, including kinetic energy (associated with motion), potential energy (stored energy based on position or state), chemical energy (stored in molecular bonds), and thermal energy (associated with heat).
Energy Transfer in Biological Systems: Energy is transferred and transformed within biological systems through metabolic processes. Organisms obtain energy from nutrients and convert it into a usable form, usually ATP, to power cellular activities.
Law of Conservation of Energy: The law of conservation of energy states that energy cannot be created or destroyed, only converted from one form to another. In biological systems, this principle emphasizes the importance of energy conservation during metabolic reactions.

Concept of Single-Celled Organisms:
Definition:
Single-celled organisms, or unicellular organisms, consist of a single cell as their entire body structure.
They are complete and independent living entities with the ability to carry out all essential life processes within a single cell.
Examples:
Bacteria, archaea, some types of algae, and protozoa are examples of single-celled organisms.
Yeasts are unicellular fungi, representing another group of single-celled microorganisms.
Cellular Organization:
Single-celled organisms exhibit a simple cellular organization where one cell performs all necessary functions for survival.
Cellular structures, such as organelles, are often less specialized compared to multicellular organisms.
Metabolism and Reproduction:
Metabolic processes, such as respiration and digestion, occur within the single cell.
Reproduction in single-celled organisms often involves cell division, such as binary fission in bacteria or budding in yeasts.
Adaptability:
Single-celled organisms can adapt rapidly to changing environments due to their simple structure and ability to reproduce quickly.
Their adaptability contributes to their success in diverse ecological niches.
Evolutionary Significance:
Single-celled organisms represent an ancient form of life and played a crucial role in the early evolution of life on Earth.
They serve as a fundamental model for understanding the origins of more complex life forms.
Roles in Ecosystems:
Many single-celled organisms play vital roles in nutrient cycling, decomposition, and symbiotic relationships within ecosystems.
They are primary producers and consumers in various food webs.
Impact on Human Health:
Some single-celled organisms, such as pathogenic bacteria and protozoa, can cause infectious diseases in humans.
Others, like beneficial bacteria in the human microbiome, contribute to health and well-being.

Concept of Species and Strains:
Species Definition:
A species is a group of organisms that can interbreed and produce fertile offspring under natural conditions.
Microbial species are defined based on genetic, phenotypic, and ecological characteristics.
Microbial Species Identification:
Microbial species are identified through techniques such as DNA sequencing, biochemical tests, and morphological observations.
The use of molecular tools has enhanced precision in microbial species identification.
Strains Definition:
Strains refer to subgroups within a microbial species that share specific characteristics but can exhibit variations.
Strains may arise due to genetic mutations or environmental influences.
Genetic Diversity:
Genetic diversity within a microbial species is essential for adaptation to diverse environments.
Strain-level differences can impact the organism's physiology, virulence, and ecological niche.
Importance in Microbiology:
Understanding species and strains is crucial for microbial taxonomy, epidemiology, and industrial applications.
It helps in tracking outbreaks, studying microbial evolution, and selecting strains for specific purposes.
Genomic Analysis:
Advances in genomics allow for in-depth analysis of microbial species and strains, revealing their genomic content, gene expression patterns, and evolutionary relationships.
Biotechnological Applications:
Strain selection is critical in biotechnological processes, such as the production of antibiotics, enzymes, and fermented foods.
Different strains may exhibit variations in productivity and product quality.
Ecological Significance:
Understanding microbial species and strains contributes to the comprehension of microbial diversity and their roles in ecological processes, including nutrient cycling and symbiotic relationships.

Identification and Classification of Microorganisms:
Microbial Identification Techniques:
Techniques include biochemical tests, molecular methods (PCR, DNA sequencing), serological assays, and mass spectrometry.
These methods help identify microorganisms based on their unique characteristics.
Taxonomic Categories:
Microorganisms are classified into taxonomic categories, including domains, kingdoms, phyla, classes, orders, families, genera, and species.
Taxonomy provides a hierarchical framework for organizing microbial diversity.
Evolutionary Relationships:
Molecular phylogenetics and comparative genomics are employed to understand the evolutionary relationships between microorganisms.
The use of genetic data helps establish more accurate taxonomic classifications.
Polyphasic Approach:
The polyphasic approach integrates information from multiple sources, such as morphology, physiology, and genomics, for comprehensive microbial identification.
It enhances the accuracy and reliability of microbial taxonomy.
Role of Type Strains:
Type strains serve as reference organisms for each species and are crucial for establishing standardized microbial taxonomy.
They represent the defining characteristics of a particular species.
Application in Medicine:
Microbial identification is essential in clinical microbiology for diagnosing infections and selecting appropriate treatments.
Accurate identification aids in understanding the epidemiology of infectious diseases.
Environmental Microbiology:
Identifying microorganisms in environmental samples contributes to the study of microbial diversity, ecosystem functioning, and biogeochemical cycles.
It helps monitor environmental changes and assess microbial impacts.
Challenges in Classification:
Challenges include the discovery of novel microorganisms, the impact of horizontal gene transfer, and the dynamic nature of microbial taxonomy, which evolves with advances in technology.

Microscopy:
Microscopy is a scientific technique that involves the use of microscopes to observe and magnify small objects or details that are not visible to the naked eye. Microscopes are instruments designed to produce enlarged images of objects, allowing scientists, researchers, and students to study the structural details of materials at a microscopic level. Microscopy has been crucial in various scientific disciplines, including biology, medicine, physics, chemistry, materials science, and geology.
Light Microscopy:
Light microscopes use visible light to observe specimens.
They are suitable for live and stained specimens, providing a broad overview of cellular structures.
Electron Microscopy:
Electron microscopes use electron beams for higher resolution than light microscopes.
Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) provide detailed images of cellular structures.
Staining Techniques:
Stains enhance the visibility of cellular components under a microscope.
Common stains include crystal violet, Gram stain, and fluorescent dyes for specific cellular structures.
Phase-Contrast Microscopy:
Phase-contrast microscopy enhances the contrast of transparent specimens without the need for staining.
It is valuable for observing living cells and dynamic processes.
Fluorescence Microscopy:
Fluorescence microscopy uses fluorophores to label specific cellular components.
It enables the visualization of specific structures or molecules with high sensitivity.
Confocal Microscopy:
Confocal microscopy provides three-dimensional images by using a focused laser beam and a pinhole aperture.
It enhances resolution and eliminates out-of-focus light.
Super-Resolution Microscopy:
Super-resolution microscopy techniques surpass the diffraction limit, achieving higher resolution than traditional light microscopy.
Examples include structured illumination microscopy (SIM) and stochastic optical reconstruction microscopy (STORM).
Applications in Microbiology:
Microscopy is essential for studying microbial morphology, cellular structures, and interactions.
It aids in medical diagnostics, environmental microbiology, and research on microbial physiology and behavior.

Ecological Aspects of Single-Celled Organisms:
Diversity and Abundance:
Single-celled organisms contribute significantly to microbial diversity and represent a large proportion of Earth's biomass.
They inhabit diverse environments, from extreme habitats to the human body.
Ecosystem Functioning:
Single-celled organisms play crucial roles in ecosystem functioning, participating in nutrient cycling, decomposition, and energy flow.
They contribute to the stability and resilience of ecosystems.
Symbiotic Relationships:
Single-celled organisms form symbiotic relationships with other organisms, including mutualistic, commensal, and parasitic associations.
These interactions impact the fitness and ecological niche of the organisms involved.
Biogeochemical Cycles:
Microorganisms are key players in biogeochemical cycles, such as the carbon, nitrogen, and phosphorus cycles.
They mediate the transformation and cycling of essential elements in ecosystems.
Adaptations to Extreme Environments:
Some single-celled organisms thrive in extreme environments, such as deep-sea hydrothermal vents, acidic hot springs, and polar regions.
Their adaptations to extreme conditions contribute to the understanding of life's limits.
Microbial Community Dynamics:
Single-celled organisms form complex microbial communities with interactions that influence community structure and function.
Understanding community dynamics is essential for ecological and environmental studies.
Impact of Environmental Changes:
Single-celled organisms are sensitive to environmental changes, making them valuable indicators of ecological health.
Studying their responses helps assess the impact of factors like climate change and pollution.
Biotechnological Applications:
Single-celled organisms have applications in bioremediation, bioenergy production, and the pharmaceutical industry.
Harnessing their ecological functions can address environmental challenges and contribute to sustainable practices.

Sterilization and Media Compositions:
Sterilization Methods:
Sterilization eliminates all forms of microbial life, including spores and viruses.
Methods include autoclaving, dry heat sterilization, chemical sterilants, and filtration.
Autoclaving:
Autoclaving uses steam under pressure to achieve high-temperature sterilization.
It is effective for heat-resistant materials and is widely used in laboratories.
Dry Heat Sterilization:
Dry heat sterilization uses hot air to sterilize materials.
It is suitable for heat-resistant items that may be damaged by moisture.
Chemical Sterilants:
Chemical sterilants, such as ethylene oxide, are used for items sensitive to heat.
They require specific exposure times and conditions for effective sterilization.
Filtration:
Filtration involves passing liquids or gases through a filter to remove microorganisms.
It is commonly used for heat-sensitive liquids and air.
Importance of Sterilization:
Sterilization is critical in preventing contamination in laboratory experiments, medical procedures, and industrial processes.
It ensures the reliability of experimental results and the safety of medical interventions.
Culture Media:
Culture media are nutrient-rich substances used to grow and maintain microorganisms in the laboratory.
They can be solid (agar plates) or liquid (broths), providing essential nutrients for microbial growth.
Media Compositions:
Media compositions vary based on the nutritional requirements of specific microorganisms.
Selective media, differential media, and enrichment media are designed to isolate and differentiate microorganisms based on their characteristics.

True Breeding:
True breeding is a type of breeding where parents produce offspring with the same phenotype. True breeding organisms are homozygous for genes, meaning both alleles are the same. For example, PP or TT are homozygous, while Pp or Tt are not.
True breeding in genetics refers to organisms that are homozygous for genes. This means that both alleles are the same, so PP or TT as opposed to Pp or Tt. When true breeding organisms are crossed, all progeny will have the same phenotype as the parents.
True-breeding plants and organisms may express phenotypes that are either homozygous dominant or homozygous recessive.

Reasons why mice are commonly used as model organisms: 
The house mouse (Mus musculus) is a commonly used model organism in scientific research because of its similarities to humans.
-Similarities to humans: Mice and humans share 85% of similarly coded genes. The mouse genome is also similar to the human genome in size and pathophysiology of disease.
-Ease of maintenance: Mice are relatively easy to care for, breed, and study. They are also cost-effective and efficient tools for drug testing and research.
-Reproductive biology: Mice have short generation times, with gestation lasting about three weeks. They are sexually mature at six to eight weeks of age, with generation times in the lab between nine and 11 weeks.
-Historical laboratory strains: The historical laboratory strains of mice stem from the Mus musculus species.
-Mice are commonly used to study human biology and disease, including how genetic mutations impact brain development. They are also commonly used to study Mendelian inheritance.

Process of Reproduction in Yeast:
Yeast reproduces asexually through a process called budding.
Here are the steps of budding: 
A small outgrowth called a bud forms on the parent cell.
The nucleus of the parent cell divides into two.
One of the nuclei moves to the new cell.
The bud grows and eventually breaks off from the parent cell.
The bud forms a new yeast cell that is genetically identical to the parent cell.
The new yeast cell matures and produces more yeast cells.
The budding process happens quickly, and the buds often form a chain. This can produce a large number of yeast cells in a short time. 

Arabidopsis thaliana:
Arabidopsis thaliana, also known as rockcress or thale cress, is a small flowering plant that is a popular model organism for plant studies. 
It has many characteristics that make it a good organism for molecular genetics experiments, including: 
Size: A. thaliana is a small plant that grows to a height of 6–12 inches.
Life cycle: A. thaliana has a short life cycle of 5–6 weeks.
Genome: A. thaliana has a small genome of around 135 megabase pairs, and its genome contains much less repetitive DNA than other plants. 
Seeds: A. thaliana produces a large number of seeds per plant, around 10,000. 
Growth: A. thaliana is a photosynthetic organism that can grow in a greenhouse or indoor growth chamber with limited space and light. 
Structure: A. thaliana has a simple structure with four whorls: four sepals, four petals, six stamens, and two carpels. 
Leaves: A. thaliana has basal leaves that are green to slightly purplish in color, and stem leaves that are smaller and unstalked. 
Flowering: A. thaliana has highly synchronized flowering, with each plant producing a large number of seed pods that contain a higher number of smaller seeds.

Reasons why A.Thaliana is used as a model organism:
Arabidopsis thaliana is a small plant in the mustard family that is used as a model organism for studying plant genetics and development. It has many advantages as a model system, including: 
Small size: Arabidopsis is small and doesn't require a large greenhouse to grow.
Short generation time: Arabidopsis has a rapid life cycle, taking about six weeks from germination to mature seed.
Self-fertilization: Arabidopsis can self-fertilize and cross-fertilize, which is useful for studying inheritance patterns and genetic diversity.
Small genome; Arabidopsis has a relatively small genome that is easily manipulated with genetic engineering techniques.
High transformation efficiency: Arabidopsis has a completely sequenced genome and powerful reverse and forward genetics.
High sensitivity: Arabidopsis is highly sensitive and low noise, making it useful for experiments that require low light conditions and long exposures.

Advantages of selecting pea plant :
Gregor Mendel chose pea plants for his experiments because they have many advantages, including: 
Easy to grow: Pea plants are easy to cultivate, economical, and require little space.
Short life cycle: Pea plants are annual plants with a short life cycle, so multiple generations can be studied in a short period of time.
Easy to cross-pollinate: Pea plants are self-pollinating, but it's easy to perform self and cross-pollination.
Easy to study: Pea plants have visible contrasting characteristics, like seed color, texture, plant height, and flower color.
Easy to maintain: Pea plants are easy to raise, maintain, and handle.
Prolific seed production: Pea plants produce a large number of seeds in one generation.
Easy to detect: Pea plants have many easily detectable contrasting characters.

Reasons why Mendel chose garden peas: 
Self-pollinating: Pea plants are self-pollinating, so it's easy to perform self and cross-pollination.
Bisexual flowers: Pea flowers contain both male and female parts.
Short life cycle: Pea plants have a short life cycle, so several generations can be studied within a short period.
Small size: Pea plants are small and easy to grow.
Many offspring: Pea plants produce many offspring in one cross.
Easy to manipulate pollination: It's easy to manipulate pollination (cross pollination).
Closed flower type: Pea flowers are closed-typed, so pollination is limited to self.
Small herbaceous plant: Pea plants are small herbaceous plants, so Mendel could grow a large number of plants.

Roles of heterotroph and autotroph in food chain:
Roles of Heterotrophs:
Consumers: Obtain energy by consuming other organisms.
Energy Transfer: Act as intermediaries in transferring energy through the food chain.
Population Regulation: Help regulate population sizes by consuming different organisms.
Decomposition: Decompose dead organic matter, recycling nutrients in the ecosystem.
Roles of Autotrophs:
Primary Producers: Convert sunlight into chemical energy, forming the base of the food chain.
Energy Source: Provide energy to heterotrophs through consumption of their organic compounds.
Oxygen Production: Release oxygen during photosynthesis, contributing to atmospheric oxygen.
Carbon Fixation: Convert carbon dioxide into organic molecules, influencing the carbon cycle.

Genetics:
Genetics is a branch of biology concerned with the study of genetic variation, genes, and heredity in organisms. Though heredity had been observed for millennia, a scientist and Gregor Mendel and Augustinian Friar working in the 19th century, were the first people to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied the concept of "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits (characteristic features) are carried down from parents to offspring. He noticed during his research that organisms (pea plants) inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still prevalent today, is an ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Trait inheritance and inheritance mechanisms Molecular of genes are still primary principles of genetics in the 21st century, but modern genetics has expanded beyond inheritance to studying the function and behaviour of genes.  The Gene structure and function, distribution and variation are studied within the context of the cell, the organism (e.g. dominance), and within the context of a population. Genetics has given rise to a number of subfields, including Molecular Genetics epigenetics and population genetics.
Gregor Johann Mendel is known as the father of genetics. Genetics is the study that deals with heredity, variation, and genes in an organism. He discovered the fundamental law of inheritance.

Mendel’s Laws:
In modern times, the first of Mendel’s laws (law of Segregation) states that genes are transferred as separate and distinct units called as gene that are carried from one generation to the next. The two members (alleles) of a gene pair, one gene on each of paired chromosomes, separate during the formation of sex cells from a parent organism. One-half of the sex cells will have one form of the gene, one-half of the sex cells are obtained from the other form; the offspring that result from these sex cells will reflect those proportions.
A modern formulation of the second law, the law of independent assortment, is that the alleles of a gene pair present on one pair of chromosomes are inherited independently of the alleles of a gene pair located on another  pair chromosome that the sex cells containing various assortments of these genes fuse at random with the sex cells produced by the other parent.
Mendel also developed the law of dominance, in which one allele exerts greater influence or is dominant than the other on the same inherited character. Mendel developed the concept of dominance from his experiments with plants, based on the concept that each plant carried two trait units, one of which dominated the other. For example, if a pea plant with the alleles T and t (T = tallness, t = shortness) is equal in height to a TT individual, the T allele (with the trait of tallness) is completely dominant. If the T t individual is shorter than the T T but still taller than the t t individual, T is partially or incompletely dominant—i.e., it has a greater influence than t but does not completely mask the presence of t, which is recessive.

Concept of Segregation and Independent Assortment:
According to the law of segregation, two alleles of a gene controlling each character stay together in the individual, but during gamete or spore formation by meiosis, the alleles of a pair segregate from each other so that a gamete or spore carries only one allele of a character.
According to the law of segregation, and the observations done by Mendel, only one of the two gene copies present in an organism is distributed to each gamete (egg or sperm cell) that it creates, and the position of these gene copies is said to be random. When an egg and a sperm join together in fertilization, they produce a new organism, their genotype consists of the alleles contained in the gametes egg or sperm.
According to the Law of Independent Assortment, the alleles of two pairs of traits separate independently from each other during gamete formation, and get randomly rearranged in the offspring at the time of fertilization, producing both parental and new combinations of traits. A suitable example of the law of independent assortment. The observations indicate that when two pure-breeding pea plants are crossed: one with yellow, round seeds (YYRR) and one with green, wrinkled seeds (yyrr). as each parent is homozygous, according to law of segregation the gametes formed by the wrinkled, green plant all are ry, and the gametes formed by the round, yellow plant are all RY. That produces an offspring where are all RrYy.
The allele or gene that specifies the yellow seed colour is more dominant compared to the allele that specifies green seed colour, subsequently the allele that specifies round shape shows a dominant character to the allele that specifies wrinkled shape, as shown by the capital and lower-case letters. This observation culminates that plants that have character that are yellow and round are dominant, because they are heterozygous for two genes, called dihybrids (di- = two, -hybrid = heterozygous).
A cross between two dihybrids (self-fertilization of a dihybrid) is known as a dihybrid cross. When Mendel did this cross between the dihybrids, he found that the resulting offspring, were found to be of four different categories of pea seeds: yellow and round, yellow and wrinkled, green and round, and green and wrinkled. These phenotypic categories (categories that are specified on observation of traits) appeared in a ratio of approximately 9:3:3:1 9:3:3:1 the resulting offspring, were found to be of four different categories o pea seeds: yellow and round, yellow and wrinkled, green and round, and green and wrinkled. The genotypic categories (categories that are specified on observation of traits) appeared in a ratio 9:3:3:1 9:3:3:1.

Gene Interaction:
1.Mendelian genetics does not explain all kinds of inheritance found in different generations for which the phenotypic ratios in some cases are different from Mendelian ratios (3:1 for monohybrid, 9:3:3:1 for di-hybrid in F2 generation). The presence of lethal alleles or more than two alleles exist which makes the particular allele dominant or partially dominant.
2.These kinds of genetic interactions between the alleles of a single gene are referred to as allelic or intra- allelic interactions. Interactions known as Non-allelic or inter-allelic interactions also occur during the development of single character is due to two or more genes affecting the expression of each other in various ways.
3.Thus, the expression of gene is not inde­pendent of each other and dependent on the presence or absence of other gene or genes.
4.Gene interactions can result in the suppression or alteration of a phenotype. This occurs when an organism inherits two different dominant genes, for example, resulting in incomplete dominance. This is commonly seen in flowers, where breeding two flowers that pass down dominant genes can result in a flower of an unusual colour caused by incomplete dominance. If red and white are dominant, for example, the offspring might be pinkish or striped in colour as the result of a gene interaction.
5.Sometimes, genetic traits are entirely suppressed.  For e.g. People having albinism (absence of Melanin pigment) may carry genes for traits that are not expressed in their phenotypes because the albinism acts to turn those genes off. This is also seen in coloration patterns in animals such as tortoise shell and cats, these animals appear with unusual hair colour is the result of selective gene interactions, that occurs with genes being turned off at some locations and turned on in other positions.
6.The fruit fly is more flexible and is extensively studied in genetics and gene interactions are well understood working with the fruit fly in lab environments. During genetic experiments on organisms like humans, the observation is however unethical, this has led to a major problem for geneticists as they are forced to rely on data from the existing population to learn about recessive and dominant and traits and observe how groups of genetic traits can interact.
7.A gene interaction can be defined as the result of inheriting genes that are conflicted in some way, thus making it impossible for all of them to express as coded information, or of inheriting a set of interrelated genes that interact with each other thus resulting in expressing a phenotype.

Law of Dominance:
Mendel’s law of dominance states that:
“When parents with pure, contrasting traits are crossed together, only one form of trait appears in the next generation. The hybrid offsprings will exhibit only the dominant trait in the phenotype.”
Law of dominance is known as the first law of inheritance. In this law, each character is controlled by distinct units called factors, which occur in pairs. If the pairs are heterozygous, one will always dominate the other.
Law of dominance explains that in a monohybrid cross between a pair of contrasting traits, only one parental character will be expressed in the F1 generation and both parental characters will be expressed in the F2 generation in the ratio 3:1.
The one which is expressed in the F1 generation is called the dominant trait and the one which is suppressed is called a recessive trait. In simple words, the law of dominance states that recessive traits are always dominated or masked by the dominant trait. This law can be described by Mendel’s experiment.
A monohybrid cross is a cross between the two monohybrid traits (TT and tt). Here plants which have the same characters, but differ in only one character were crossed.
For monohybrid cross, Mendel began with a pair of pea plants with two contrasting traits, i.e., one tall and another dwarf. The cross-pollination of tall and dwarf plants resulted in tall plants and the offspring were called F1 progeny. The trait which is expressed in the phenotype is called the dominant trait while the one that is not is called the recessive trait.
He then continued his experiment with self-pollination of F1 progeny plants. This resulted in both tall and short plants in the ratio of 3:1 which gave rise to the law of segregation.

Law of Segregation:
Mendel’s law of segregation states that:
“During the formation of gamete, each gene separates from each other so that each gamete carries only one allele for each gene.”
Law of segregation is the second law of inheritance. This law explains that the pair of alleles segregate from each other during meiosis cell division (gamete formation) so that only one allele will be present in each gamete.
In a monohybrid cross, both the alleles are expressed in the F2 generation without any blending. Thus, the law of segregation is based on the fact that each gamete contains only one allele.
This law is based on four basic concepts:
-A gene exists in more than one form of an allele.
-When gametes are produced by meiosis, the allelic pairs separate, leaving each gamete with a single allele.
-Every organism inherits two alleles for each trait.
-The two alleles of a pair are different, i.e., one is dominant and one is recessive.

Single gene disorders in humans:
When a certain gene is found to cause a disease, we refer to it as a single gene disorder or a Mendelian disorder.  Infect single gene disorders are not very common. For example, only one in 2,500 people are born with cystic fibrosis. There are a number of inheritance patterns of single gene disorders that are predictable it is figured out.
Single Mutated genes holds to around 4000 human diseases that are subsequently passed on to further generations, the genes that are passed on can be dominant or recessive genes. in such cases either the sperm or the egg may be carriers of the disorder and makes it difficult to screen both the partners.
Some examples of single-gene disorders include: Cystic fibrosis, alpha- and beta-thalassemia’s, Fragile X syndrome, Marfan syndrome, Sickle cell Anaemia, Huntington's disease, and hemochromatosis.
Complementation using human genetics: In genetics, complementation occurs when two strains of an organism with different homozygous recessive mutations when crossed produce the same mutant phenotype (for example, a change in wing structure in flies) when these strains are crossed their offspring with the wild-type phenotype are observed. Complementation will occur only if the mutations are in different genes. If several genes join together to support a certain function (for example, to form a structure), cell crossings (somatic cell hybridization) may be used to determine the number of genes involved. Two cells, upon crossing, typically complement each other's defect if their mutations are in different genes, however the defect persists if the mutations are present in the same gene. Special mouse cell lines have been developed that harbour single human chromosomes, which can be introduced into a human cell line by microcell-mediated chromosome transfer. This technique features the identification of the chromosome that harbours a complementing gene.

Concept of matching Phenotype to Genes:
The genotype–phenotype distinction is drawn in genetics. "Genotype” is an organism's full information about heredity. "Phenotype" is an organism's properties that are actually observed, such as development, morphology or behaviour. This distinction is fundamental in the study of inheritance of traits and their evolution.
The chances of survival and reproductive output are determined by the organism physical properties, but the inheritance of physical properties is dependent on the inheritance of genes. Therefore, understanding the theory of evolution through natural selection, requires a deep understanding of the genotype–phenotype distinction.
The genes contribute to a trait, and the phenotype is the observable expression of the genes (and therefore the genotype that affects the trait). For e.g. If a white mouse had recessive genes that caused the genes responsible for colour to be inactive, its genotype would be responsible for its phenotype (the white colour).
The mapping of a set of genotypes to a set of phenotypes is sometimes referred to as the genotype–phenotype an organism's genotype has a great influence (the largest by far for morphology) in the formation of its phenotype, but this is not the only case. Even two organisms with identical genotypes show differences in their phenotypes.
One of the experiences in everyday life with identical twins (monozygous) Identical twins share the same genotype, since their genomes are identical; but they show the same phenotype, although their phenotypes may look similar. This is apparent that their mothers and close friends can spot minute differences, even though others might not be able to see the subtle differences. Further, identical twins can be distinguished by their fingerprints, which are never completely identical.

Concept of recessiveness and dominance:
Everyone inherits two copies of each gene from their parents, and the copies can either be different or the same. If the copies are different, then one is going to mask the effects of the other. The gene that trumps over the other is usually known as the dominant gene, and the weaker gene is known as recessive. In the presence of a dominant gene, a recessive gene will not manifest its traits. When two recessive genes are paired however, their traits will be manifested.
Dominant genes are also the ones whose traits are manifested in the offspring. For recessive traits to be manifested, both parents have to carry that recessive gene singly or in a pair. The principle determines the presence of similar and differences among family members. There are traits which will definitely appear in the child, whenever present these are known as dominant traits, other traits will be recessive only in the absence of a dominant traits.

Mitosis and Meiosis:
Mitosis is the process that occurs when somatic cell divides to form two daughter cells.  It is an important process in normal organism development, Mitosis requires a set of specialized cell structures.  Chromosomes are the most important part for mitosis because they are separated during the process and evenly distributed into two daughter cells. The spindle is formed around a cytosolic structure called centrosome, which is main driving force for chromosome separation.
Meiosis is the type of cell division by which germ cells (eggs and sperm) are produced. Meiosis involves a reduction in the amount of genetic material, during meiosis, chromosomes are also duplicated, cell division occurs twice consecutively, leading the half of the chromosome number in 4 daughter cells.  This process is used for generating germ line cells, the gametes.  

Epistasis: The interaction that occurs between nonallelic genes at two or more loci resulting in one gene masking the phenotypic expression of another gene, Epistasis is defined as the interaction between genes that influences a phenotype. Genes can either mask each other so that one is considered “dominant” or they can combine to form a new trait. It is the conditional relationship between two genes that can determine a single phenotype of some traits. At each locus there are two alleles that decide phenotypes. They can affect one another in such a way that, regardless of the allele of one gene, it is recessive gene to one dominant allele of the other.

Gene mapping:
Gene mapping refers to one of the two different ways of positioning the gene on a chromosome. The first type of gene mapping was also called genetic mapping. Genetic mapping   determines how two genes on a chromosome relate in their positions, with the use of linkage analysis. Physical mapping, which is the other type of gene mapping, locates genes by their absolute positions on a chromosome using any available technique. Once a gene is located, its DNA sequence determined, it can be cloned and its molecular product studied.
Studies show that the first evidence of mapping of a gene was reported by Roger Donahue and associates in 1968, the first observation was done by mapping a gene to an autosome. They were able experiment through linkage analysis and estimated the genetic distance of 2.5 map units between two loci or gene locations on chromosome 1.
In 1971, techniques such as chromosome banding techniques were developed, which opened the way to be able to identify various types alternations for researchers, which included insertions, deletions, and translocations, as well as mapping to position. In accordance with this, restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP) analysis was developed and led by the early 1990s to the identification of a number of genes associated with disease in humans. A complementary technique, fluorescence in situ hybridization, developed about the same time, also contributed to the mapping efforts.

Concept of Allele:
William Bateson, first coined the term ‘allelomorph’ (alternative form) meaning one of an array of different forms of a gene. Later this term was shortened by others to ‘allele’. So, allele is defined as one of two or more alternative forms that are present in a single gene. Alleles for any given gene occupy the same locus or position on homologous chromosomes.
A single gene having different alleles have a unique nucleotide sequence, and processes biochemical and developmental are all concerned with their activities, in such cases although their individual phenotypes may be different. For example, the height of the pea plant is determined by allele tall and dwarf traits.
Alleles may occur in pairs, or there may be multiple alleles affecting the expression (phenotype) of a particular trait. The combination of alleles that an organism carries constitutes of its genotype. If the paired alleles are the same, the organism’s genotype is said to be homozygous for that particular trait; if they are different, the organism’s genotype is heterozygous. A dominant allele will dominate the traits of a recessive allele in a heterozygous pairing. In some traits, however, alleles may be codominant they may be neither dominant or recessive.

Genotype vs. Phenotype:
1. Definition:
Genotype: The hereditary information of the organism in the form of genes in the DNA and remains the same throughout life.
Phenotype: The characteristics of an organism that are visible are known as phenotypes.
2. Relationship:
Genotype: The same genotype produces the same phenotype.
Phenotype: The same phenotype may or may not belong to the same genotype.
3. Location:
Genotype: Present inside the body as genetic material.
Phenotype: Expression of genes as the external appearance.
4. Inheritance:
Genotype: Inherited from parent to offspring.
Phenotype: Not directly inherited from the parent.
5. Determination:
Genotype: Determined by scientific methods such as the polymerase chain reaction.
Phenotype: Determined by observing the organism.
6. Factors Influencing:
Genotype: Affected by genes.
Phenotype: Affected by genotype and environmental conditions.
7. Examples:
Genotype: Blood group, eye color, height, and genetic diseases.
Phenotype: Weight, physique, beak shape of birds.

Dominant Alleles: 
A dominant allele is an allele that expresses itself even when another allele is present. A dominant allele produces a dominant phenotype in individuals who have one copy of the allele. For example, the brown eyes allele is dominant.
Dominant traits are always expressed when the connected allele is dominant, even if only one copy exists.
Masking: They mask the expression of a recessive allele if paired with it. In other words, one copy of a dominant allele is enough for the corresponding trait to be expressed.
Expression: They always express their associated trait, regardless of whether they are paired with another dominant or recessive allele.
Representation: Typically symbolized by uppercase letters (e.g., B for brown eye color).
Examples: Brown eyes, curly hair, tall stature.

Recessive Alleles:
A recessive allele is an allele that is suppressed by a dominant allele. A recessive allele produces a recessive phenotype in individuals who have two copies of the allele, one from each parent. For example, the blue eyes allele is recessive.
Masked: They are masked by a dominant allele when paired together. Their associated trait will only be expressed if both alleles in the pair are recessive.
Expression: Only expressed when present in two copies (homozygous state).
Representation: Typically symbolized by lowercase letters (e.g., b for blue eye color).
Examples: Blue eyes, straight hair, short stature.

Monohybrid Cross vs. Dihybrid Cross:
Monohybrid Cross:
Definition: Monohybrid cross refers to the genetic cross that involves mating two homozygous individuals consisting of a single character present in a single locus.
Number of Characters: Only one character is taken into consideration.
Pair of Genes: One pair of genes is involved.
Phenotypic Ratio: The anticipated phenotypic ratio is 3:1.
Law: The Law of Segregation was formulated based on the monohybrid cross.
Genotypic Ratio: The anticipated genotypic ratio includes 1:2:1.
Test Cross: Test cross-ratio is 1:1.
Dihybrid Cross:
Definition: Dihybrid cross highlights the genetic cross that consists of the mating of two homozygous individuals considering two non-linked characters present in different loci.
Number of Characters: Two characters of different loci are considered.
Pair of Genes: Two pairs of genes are involved.
Phenotypic Ratio: The anticipated phenotypic ratio is 9:3:3:1.
Law: The Law of Independent Assortment was formulated based on the dihybrid cross.
Genotypic Ratio: The anticipated genotypic ratio includes 1:2:2:4:1:2:1:2:1.
Test Cross: Test cross-ratio is 1:1:1:1.
Example:
Suppose you are crossing two pea plants—one with yellow seeds (YY) and another with green seeds (yy).
Monohybrid Cross (Single Trait - Seed Color):
Y (yellow) x y (green)
Genotypic Ratio: Yy (heterozygous)
Phenotypic Ratio: 1 yellow : 1 green
Dihybrid Cross (Two Traits - Seed Color and Texture):
YYRR (yellow, round) x yyrr (green, wrinkled)
Genotypic Ratio: YyRr (heterozygous for both traits)
Phenotypic Ratio: 9 yellow, round : 3 yellow, wrinkled : 3 green, round : 1 green, wrinkled

Dihybrid Cross Concept:
A dihybrid cross involves the simultaneous consideration of two different traits (genes) that are located on different loci (positions) of homologous chromosomes. This type of genetic cross helps predict the inheritance patterns of two traits simultaneously. The Law of Independent Assortment, formulated by Gregor Mendel, is applied to dihybrid crosses.
Example of Dihybrid Cross:
Let's consider a dihybrid cross involving pea plants. We'll look at the inheritance of seed color (Y = yellow, y = green) and seed shape (R = round, r = wrinkled).
Parent 1: YYRR (yellow, round)
Parent 2: yyrr (green, wrinkled)
Punnett Square for Dihybrid Cross:
        YR     Yr     yR     yr
---------------------------------
YR |   YYRR   YYRr   YyRR   YyRr
Yr |   YYRr   YYrr   YyRr   Yyrr
yR |   YyRR   YyRr   yyRR   yyRr
yr |   YyRr   Yyrr   yyRr   yyrr
-Phenotypic Ratio:
Yellow, Round: 9
Yellow, Wrinkled: 3
Green, Round: 3
Green, Wrinkled: 1
-Genotypic Ratio:
YYRR : YYRr : YyRR : YyRr : YYRr : YYrr : YyRr : Yyrr : YyRR : YyRr : yyRR : yyRr : YyRr : Yyrr : yyRr : yyrr.

Differences between sexual and asexual reproduction: 
Number of parents: Sexual reproduction involves two parents, while asexual reproduction involves one parent.
Genetic information: In sexual reproduction, each parent contributes half of their DNA, which is recombined in the offspring. In asexual reproduction, the parent passes a copy of all of its DNA to its offspring.
Energy requirements: Sexual reproduction requires more energy than asexual reproduction.
Fertilization: Sexual reproduction involves fertilization, while asexual reproduction does not.
Gametes: Sexual reproduction involves gametes, while asexual reproduction does not.
Mixing of hereditary material: Sexual reproduction involves mixing of hereditary material, while asexual reproduction does not.

Homozygous vs Heterozygous:
1.Homozygous:It has two same copies of the same allele coding for a particular trait. Heterozygous: It contains two different copies of alleles coding for a particular trait.
2.Homozygous:Contains only one type of allele, either dominant or recessive Contains different alleles for a trait. Heterozygous: Both dominant and recessive
3.Homozygous:Self-fertilization results in the repetition of the same traits over generations. Heterozygous: Self-fertilization results in different combination of traits over the next generations

Human Eye:
A human eye is roughly 2.3 cm in diameter and is almost a spherical ball filled with some fluid. It consists of the following parts:
Sclera: It is the outer covering, a protective tough white layer called the sclera (white part of the eye).
Cornea: The front transparent part of the sclera is called the cornea. Light enters the eye through the cornea.
Iris: A dark muscular tissue and ring-like structure behind the cornea is known as the iris. The colour of the iris actually indicates the colour of the eye. The iris also helps regulate or adjust exposure by adjusting the iris.
Pupil: A small opening in the iris is known as a pupil. Its size is controlled with the help of iris. It controls the amount of light that enters the eye.
Lens: Behind the pupil, there is a transparent structure called a lens. By the action of ciliary muscles, it changes its shape to focus light on the retina. It becomes thinner to focus on distant objects and becomes thicker to focus on the nearby objects.
Retina: It is a light-sensitive layer that consists of numerous nerve cells. It converts images formed by the lens into electrical impulses. These electrical impulses are then transmitted to the brain through optic nerves.
Optic nerves: Optic nerves are of two types. These include cones and rods.
Cones: Cones are the nerve cells that are more sensitive to bright light. They help in detailed central and colour vision.
Rods: Rods are the optic nerve cells that are more sensitive to dim lights. They help in peripheral vision.
At the junction of the optic nerve and retina, there are no sensory nerve cells. So no vision is possible at that point and is known as a blind spot.
